And, the catholic faith is this,
I have been desiring to finally get serious about losing weight for the last month or so. I am just kind of disgusted with myself (but in a good way). Is there a good way of being disgusted with yourself? Hmm. I have always wanted some quick fix. I have bought diet pills, shakes, etc. I definitely don't EVER want to get a gastric bypass, but I really was mad that Kaiser Permanente won't cover the costs for a Lap Band. But you know what? I don't want the Lap Band. I don't want surgery. I don't want to have some foreign object stuck in my body, possible complications, constant maintenance, etc. I don't want to not be able to enjoy an actual meal with my husband or my family at the Holidays. I don't want to have to permanently eliminate foods from my diet.
london: harvill secker 2012
Wednesday, 02 May 2012
the night before. Sometimes when we are in a hurry and it's always
After marveling at our past presidents, Lee and I took to the road and did the long Needles Highway loop in Custer State Park. It was really fun going thru the tunnels and slowly going down mountain sides but at the end of the couple hour drive Lee and I were both feeling dizzy from all the loops and switchbacks...
6. the promotion of excessive drinking
I should have maybe bought a pound of emergency sausage.
I was too young to pay attention to early-day Trew clotheslines, but I have no doubt there were a lot of patched, flour- and feed-sack drawers flapping in the Texas Panhandle breeze.
The teaching of nonduality has a reach as global as the technology and it is capable of being heard and understood by multitudes more than currently receive and understand the teaching.
Unlike other authors, Araton paints a complete picture of Berra. This is about far more than quirky sayings. This book describes the pride that powered a 14-year standoff with team owner George Steinbrenner.
...can make all the difference.
The nose offered lifted spicy rich plum fruit and earthy, mineral notes.
As I mentioned yesterday, also on the agenda is starting to plan our next event. Perhaps we could tie it all in with the hydrant. Payton and Suki talked about dancing in a big circle around it. I would love to make it into a big May pole, but I don't want to wait til May to brag, that is for sure.
So, without delaying here is my card:
Just came through to remove the cobwebs and put up
Yeah I just like hanging out in the reeds looking at sheep, what?
Not leaving the program, not planning on doing it again. Just had to see for myself.
I wanted to share another of the cards I made for the February Artistic Outpost release, this one featuring the image of Amelia Earhart. A rugged individualist, yes, but I wanted to keep the card more on the soft and feminine side, honoring her as a female aviation pioneer. I started by stamping various images from the set in versamark onto vanilla CS and then clear embossed it. From there, I sponged it using Broken China and Creamy Caramel. I created a white rosette with a touch of Creamy Carmel sponging. The image was stamped with Ranger Jet Black Archival ink and the rest of the stamping was done with Broken China DI, sponged over with Creamy Caramel and a hit of Vintage Photo DI. I cut the AVIATION seal out of the post mark stamp from this set. The words 'Dream', 'Explore' and 'Discover' are from the Huck Finn set. I gave Amelia a little bling with the matching rhinestones and silver glass glitter on the clothes pin. The propeller was silver embossed on black CS and the sentiment banner was cut with the Tattered Banners die. For dimension and texture, I added a piece of the white corrugated cardboard I sell in my Zibbet boutique. And don't forget, there is a 10% discount coupon for March for you to try out my new Zibbet shop. Just enter MARCH10 upon checkout.
We’re the same age;; I usually use formal speech to talk to the EXO members
Shame on you, congress.
Witnesses in the Libyan capital say the country's legislative branch is among government buildings set on fire as opposition activists battled security forces and government supporters. Gunfire has been reported in the capital.
"It wasn't a spider," I assured him. "It was big. Could have been a tarantula, I suppose. But more likely a mouse."
Okay, so that was easy.
Leaving me to wonder, who is really at war with the faithful, for it sure doesn't look like is it the current administration.
During your career, education can often help to take your farther than you would otherwise have gone had you not achieved this level. As the above lists show, there are many options you can pursue to continue your education at any stage of your career.
I am happy to say that I have the tea urn (and all his others) and the filagree bowl in my collection. Here is Greg's website: http://www.miniaturesinsilver.com/
beannacht - john o'donohue
Blistered toes. Legs that felt like they had iron shackles on them. My sling-purse accruing 5 kg with every step I took.
The break even point, you remember, is reached when the costs for starting the business have been satisfied and anything after that is pure profit.
H - David Bowie: Rock n' Roll Suicide.
But, I love to make my cards big, (this one is 5 x 7) and the stamps were not the size I needed, so I took the stamped art into Paint.net and resized it and colored it.
What I've noticed so far - I wake up better. Prior to GAPS intro, I would go to sleep and sack out. When presented with my husband waking up and trying to get me up, I was super resistant and cranky. I would roll over and tell him to go away.
I have read extensively, researched until my computer ran hot from overuse, listened to lectures, watched documentaries and given each theory serious trial periods. I've had successes and failures. Tweaked programs and visited doctors for advice. Let me tell you kids, I've been there, done that and then some.
6. Seize the day! If you do, be prepared for a struggle.
Hobby-video games, playing sports
Father! Restore my destiny fully to Your Glory! In Jesus Christ Name I pray! Amen!
Brush tops with milk. Bake at 375 degrees F for ¾ to 1 hour. Loaves should be golden brown and sound hollow when tapped.
The particular customs and manners that may happen to be received in that state? It is difficult to determine on the standard by which the manners of a nation may be tried, whether catholic, or particular. It is more difficult for a native to bring to that standard the manners of his own nation, familiarized to him by habit. There must doubtless be an unhappy influence on the manners of our people produced by the existence of slavery among us. The whole commerce between master and slave is a perpetual exercise of the most boisterous passions, the most unremitting despotism on the one part, and degrading submissions on the other. Our children see this, and learn to imitate it; for man is an imitative animal. This quality is the germ of all education in him. From his cradle to his grave he is learning to do what he sees others do. If a parent could find no motive either in his philanthropy or his self love, for restraining the intemperance of passion towards his slave, it should always be a sufficient one that his child is present. But generally it is not sufficient. The parent storms, the child looks on, catches the lineaments of wrath, puts on the same airs in the circle of smaller slaves, gives a loose to the worst of passions, and thus nursed, educated, and daily exercised in tyranny, cannot but be stamped by it with odious pecularities. The man must be a prodigy who can retain his manners and morals undepraved by such circumstances. And with what execration should the statesman be loaded, who, permitting one half the citizens thus to trarnple on the rights of the other, transforms those into despots, and these into enemies, destroys the morals of the one part, and the amor patriae of the other. For if a slave can have a country in this world, it must be any other in preference to that in which he is born to live and labour for another; in which he must lock up the faculties of his nature, contribute as far as depends on his individual endeavours to the evanishment of the human race, or entail his own miserable condition on the endless generations proceeding from him. With the morals of the people, their industry also is destroyed. For in a warm climate, no man will labour for himself who can make another labour for him. This is so true, that of the proprietors of slaves a very small proportion indeed are ever seen to labour. And can the liberties of a nation be thought secure when we have removed their only firm basis, a conviction in the minds of the people that these liberties are of the gift of God? That they are not to be violated but with his wrath? Indeed I tremble for my country when I reflect that God is just: that his justice cannot sleep for ever: that considering numbers, nature and natural means only, a revolution of the wheel of fortune, an exchange of situation is among possible events: that it may become probable by supernatural interference! The almighty has no attribute which can take side with us in such a contest. But it is impossible to be temperate and to pursue this subject through the various considerations of policy, of morals, of history natural and civil. We must be contented to hope they will force their way into every one’s mind. I think a change already perceptible, since the origin of the present revolution. The spirit of the master is abating, that of the slave rising from the dust, his condition mollifying, the way I hope preparing, under the auspices of heaven, for a total emancipation, and that this is disposed, in the order of events, to be with the consent of the masters, rather than by their extirpation.
out with eddies and foam!
- Add liver, salt and peper and mix together with garlic in the pan.
Cinco de Mayo, as it's observed in the US, is a sort of general celebration of Mexican heritage; it is not, as many would have you believe, the Mexican Independence Day. Rather, it's a commemoration of the French army's defeat at the hands of the Mexicans at Puebla in the latter part of the nineteenth century.
CSI : New York
I first removed to older tops with a hammer, you might want to remove all the drawers and look under your counter to see if there is a couple of screws in the corners first and remove the kitchen sink. Sorry I didn't take pictures of that step. It was surprisingly easy. I never messed with any plumbing and was very hesitated at first but there was now way to go forward with this project until I did. There has to be the first for everything!
from above the chest to the hairline is one-seventh of the height of a man
engineer another Holocaust!
However, today’s invention implies that even if the swimmer’s form is good and healthy, the use of conventional swim paddles impairs that form and stresses the swimmer’s shoulder. According to the disclosure, this stress occurs because conventional paddles act as an extension of the hand and require the swimmer to exert substantial pressure on the paddle with both the fingers and the palm of the hand – wherein the natural stroke disproportionately uses the palm. Thus, the force applied by the extended fingers on the paddle impairs the swimmer’s technique.
In San Antonio, Bexar County judges are planning a series of back-to-back trials to catch up on their backlogged docket, but the District Attorney says it creates too much work for them. They're calling it a "rocket docket," which is a term usually reserved for plea-mill scenarios as opposed to taking cases to trial.
I'd love some suggestions! How do YOU use sriracha sauce?
I have been wanting to try out a Mojo Monday sketch for a while but been very intimidated by the wonderful work always seen on the blog there. However with things the way they have been this last week or so, especially with the news from home I am feeling the need to “try” things I have wanted to do. Compelled, if you will, to tackle some of the things I want to do or have intimidated me.
I agreed in a most grumpy tone. Hubby, while busy playing video games or something useful told me I was being negative.
Flowers were threaded through several courses in this meal - and makes a big appearance in the grand finale in the subtly sweet and floral cream pudding made from sakura petals, topped by adorable, exquisite little alpine strawberries and a cherry-blossom yogurt-sorbet. The preserved cherry blossom that served as edible garnish was an interesting touch for this course, both visually and in adding a strong kick of flavor as our last bite.
Anyway I took the precaution of not bringing much money out with me, that way nobody can con me out of it. (remember I said that) I love the life and colour of this place, despite the fact that most of it is here solely for the tourists and you get accosted on every corner “algo para comer senor?” “good leather, cheap, we take dollars”, not a lot different to Florida really just more colour.
10/22 – The Compound – Albuquerque, NM
care plan as Governor
2. Change the situation.
“Like it or not, we have no choice but to build the bridges now for safety reasons and to advance the quality of life and economy here.”
I was completely lost in time. I can only image how life must have been back then. If those walls could talk!
Making best use of your investing fund is ideally desired but Not always possible. Still You can plan your investment in stock markets by taking best stocks of Indian markets using an effective investing strategy. Putting good money control practice in place is real need of this hour.
This has been an exciting month. My new Kinetic bike trainer came in the mail a couple of weeks ago, so I should be exercising a little more regularly now. That, and my mom gave me three books, completely by surprise. One I don't care much for; it's a picture book about Passover, and since I'm not Jewish, nor particularly interested in the writer or illustrator, I will most likely trade it for another on my next trip to the used book store. But the other two are swell, and just my kind of books. One is titled "The Crystal Prison" and written by Robin Jarvis; it is part of the Deptford Mice Trilogy. The other one is part of The Mistmantle Chronicles, titled "Urchin and the Heartstone" and written by M. I. McAllister. Both are the second volumes in each of these series, so I may get the first volumes before I begin to read them. They smell of Redwall ripoffs to me, especially the latter one, but I don't care. The writing in both books appeals to me no matter where I flip them open, while I find only the first book in the Redwall series at all interesting. And in any case I may be wrong.
David sings, “Remove Your stroke from me; I am spent by the hostility of Your hand,” noting that God “consumes” and lamenting that “all mankind is a mere breath!” (Psalm 39:10,11; ESV) “Surely,” writes the psalmist, “a man goes about as a shadow!” (Psalm 39:6) “When You discipline a man with rebukes for sin, you consume like a moth what is dear to him.” (Psalm 39:11)
When the child was a child, It threw a stick like a lance against a tree, And it quivers there still today.
Other scientists argued that there must have been an explanation other than SIRT1 to account for their findings.
A few more small findings (you can use anything...findings for scrapbooks, buttons etc.)
3/4 cup heavy whipping cream
It took a week of trying for GriefCom to connect with Richard Dionne, at which point we were given a promise that Red Deer would provide proof of distribution within a week.
Imagine a Kiwanis Club Monte Carlo Night in a high school gym, if they started to plan it that morning. It was a big, sorry mess. Many of the producers privately expressed their disgust with it as well. Not one master distiller was in attendance and only a handful of top distillery people of any kind came. Everything about it had an air of desperation.
Capital Metro says MetroRapid can anticipate at least 20,000 daily boardings after the service opens. Plans include two high-capacity, rapid bus lines that would run north-south across the city for a total of 37.5 miles. The North Lamar Boulevard/South Congress Avenue line will run for a total of 21 miles from Tech Ridge Park and Ride to Southpark Meadows. The Burnet/South Lamar Boulevard will total 16 miles and will run from North Austin Medical Center to Westgate Transit Center.
Had it gone the other way, it still would have been a season to remember.
“So,” Chris paused, looking at Dee, “you always lived here. Then Hank’s family moved back down here, and you found out that each of your ancestors knew each other?”
Now, I've discovered - you don't have to have ANY showers to bring spring flowers. Well, maybe a you need a watering can once in a while. I'm thoroughly enjoying my 2 small spots of colorful flowers in the front yard that are standing strong despite the harsh wind and very little water. Things do bloom here - I can't wait until the cacti start blooming. We've had the trees blossom (and then have the petals blown away by the wind.) I've also had my bulbs come up! For the record, I put these in the ground on December 15th. It was a very nice warm day just before we got one of our 3 snow storms. I actually worried that it might not get cold enough for them to stay dormant until spring, but we did have 2 weeks of super cold weather and several weeks of chilly, so it seemed to do the job nicely.
I’ll change my habits and be the kind to dream and rise above.
DerWesten always photographs their subjects using the same props.
GPS: N 30447 25340 (Accuracy – 6m)
waiting, anticipating our communion.
(b) Timber, and
The current legal structures that define charitable activities or that privilege certain public goods with tax exemptions say nothing about data. They say nothing about any public good created digitally – such as open source software used for emergency response. They also say nothing about access to these resources. Is access to the digital world a right for all citizens or a privilege for those who can pay? There are many organizations of all kinds – political, commercial, and charitable – working on these issues. However, enterprises in the social sector have yet to recognize the stake they have in these questions and in the rules that will define how data assets are valued as
....love, the Serendipitous Daydreamer
** unfortunately because I chose a non-name email address, sometimes computers do not send mail through because they think it is a spam addy...so if you cannot get through on this email address, try reikihealinginireland@yahoo.com. Sigh...must rethink my email addy haha.
of the reading lists for one of my classes! How exciting! I started
- Sean O'Casey
Not since the Nazis took every penny off German Jewish families during 1937 – and then charged their relatives abroad to let them flee - has there been quite such a brass-necked con on the scale of bankers paying themselves bonuses this year. But pay themselves they will, and to Hell with what the Sovereign body of our country thinks.
Over medium heat bring the Queso up to a simmer until all the cheese has melted, turn down to a simmer and cook for just 5 minutes, season with the salt.
BUT, we will moderate the comments by only 5 comments per day by 1 user. Excess number of maximum comments are not counted.
—- in love and peace, xx
-20 TM panels completed
CESAREO DURBAN, defendant-appellant.
so there you have it. i just wanted to show you that with a couple hours, less than $5, and some workable stuff, you can make a cute and functional space for your family. hope you all have a lovely day!
Now mom is back to work and busy again. What are we to do?
Marguerite Marsh
Just one more first in a long line of firsts, and maybe not such a big one in the grand scheme...but, it was a big deal to me.
I forgive myself that I have accepted and allowed myself to fear walking a new path as new physical direction/expression of me because I fear losing that experience I have within participating in past patterns that do not support me to re-establish my self dignity and self respect.
If anyone has been in these countries during June-July, please send me some feedback! Places to see, food to eat, weather, what to wear!
I have a picture in my mind of a dark curly haired, dimpled face little boy running around on streets of gold...sitting at the feet of Jesus...I often wonder what he is doing. I can not even fathom how amazing Heaven is and just how perfect his life is now. My mind can only conjure pictures of earthy beauty and I know that can not even compare to the beauty my baby boy beholds daily. I'm pretty sure he is not going to be having a party in Heaven tomorrow to celebrate his second birthday because time is not measured by days, weeks, months, or years there. Perhaps every moment is a celebration in heaven. I just do not know...but I do have a picture in my mind. It gives me comfort and peace to dream.
I know you've seen my urns with the topiaries many times before. I found these urns at Home Goods many years ago. They are supposed to be twins and are hand painted but as you can see, they are not identical twinkies! But I still love 'em!
nature. This is because I like the sense of being free......
-256MB of RAM
Agriculture and beekeeping contrast starkly from the United States to Ethiopia. America’s food production is now accomplished by a small fraction of the population, while almost all Ethiopians are farmers. Even though beekeeping and the pollination it provides is responsible for one third of our food production, an extremely small group of people manage our bees. By contrast, beekeeping is a part of many Ethiopian farm families’ endeavors. Honey bees in the US are housed almost exclusively in removable frame hives, mostly of the Langstroth design. A few individuals keep bees in top bar hives or Warre hives. In Ethiopia, modern bee hives are few; some keep bees in mud-coated straw top bar hives, known as transitional hives. However, the vast majority of hives are traditional bee hives which are simple six-foot cylinders made of cane and lined with leaves. Traditional Ethiopian bee hives are placed empty in the forest tree tops with the leaves of the Limich plant used to attract swarms of honey bees. The hive trees are truly beautiful and impressive sights. With woven bee hives mounted among the branches of trees from 50 to 120 feet above the ground, the trees resemble larger-scale versions of native Ethiopian trees covered with weaver bird nests.
No longer with shine,
Here are the rules.....
Oh and last night was oh so so much better, I still got to feed and snuggle my baby but I got some sleep too.
Gurbachan Singh led the negotiations with the state government on behalf of the deceased’s family. He had threatened that he would resign as Akal Takht chief if no action was taken against the erring officials.
Published by PhotoIreland, 2011
But while Balun and Lucas were GZ's most famous contributors, the GZ masthead included plenty of other luminaries, like Psychotronic author Michael Weldon, Broken Minds/Broken Mirrors author Maitland McDonagh, and Swamp Thing artist and Taboo publisher Stephen Bissette. Given the amount of talent that was represented in GZ's pages, editor Chris Alexander has done a heroic job of compiling a proper Best Of. Like any fan would, though, I have my own personal nitpicks concerning pieces that I believe ought to have made the cut but didn't - such as Bissette's preview of Alejandro Jodorwky's Santa Sangre (1989) or McDonagh's review of Henry: Portrait of a Serial Killer (both examples of the way that GZ shined a light on fringe films well before any other publication).
Up on the Sun
what if god punishes me and smites me for my wickedness by taking my easy orgasms away.
I’ve been reading some books and articles here and there about people who run really really well and just lately I’ve noticed something that draws me to these particular athletes I like. They all just love to run, regardless of winning or losing or anything else. That’s my style. Run and enjoy it, don’t have some ulterior motive.
Not to mention, if you ask me the question, "What are you looking for?" I can ramble on about something I'd love to see (such as a completely charming, witty, and fun historical romance a la Julia Quinn) but what I offered rep for just this week would never have landed on my "This is what I'm looking for" list.
(Ok, so it’s a little bit funny.)
So after my success with silk earlier this month, I decided to listen to my fabric and make the tulip skirt. Success! I think it's pretty cute. I probably will not be making a whole bunch of these - the straight skirt is still my preferred silhouette - but I think it's fun for being different.
"Oh God, honey. Every time I pass the guards at home, they all have a look that seems to say, 'I know who you did last weekend!' Arghhh!"
Punches: Martha Stewart Branch; McGill Holly; Punch Bunch Fern; EK Success punch edger Scandinavian Lace Chain
locked deep in my heart
Why would a man assault a nurse attempting to aid his wife, who was probably in her early twenties or perhaps even younger?
- Had Enough, England, 28/12/2010 15:40
Ex sex is like getting drunk. It all seems to be a grand idea while you’re knocking back the shots of good times but the emotional hangover the next day makes one wonder if it wouldn’t have been better to curl up in bed alone with a cup of rooibos tea.
AVOID:
Bring out a clean trifle bowl or a rectangle 2-quart baking dish. To assemble, start with a layer of ladyfingers or cake, breaking pieces as necessary to fill all the random gaps and making a nice complete layer. Brush on 1/3 (if using a tall serving vessel like a trifle bowl) or 1/2 (if using the baking dish) of the syrup, making sure there is even distribution of the syrup across the layer of cake. Spread 1/3 or 1/2 of the creamy filling, likewise. Repeat. After you have finished the top creamy layer, use a spatula to smooth the surface as much as possible.
I was asked to write this story for Cancer Research, and it was first published in the concert programme for their 2008 fundraising carol service at St Paul's Cathedral. It is dedicated to the memory of my sister, Gloria, who died of cancer in December 2001.
Your phone keeps dropping calls for not reason.
Barcia capped off his championship-winning Eastern Regional Supercross Lites Class season by winning the Nuclear Cowboyz Holeshot Award before leading all 15 laps of the Main Event en route to his sixth victory of the season. Barcia clinched the championship earlier this year at the New Orleans stop.
Add your vote to the list! Put in the comments box:
Armed with $7.10 in store credit, Sarina and I headed straight for the book aisle, of course. We took our time trying to select just the right thing-- a Disney compilation? A lift-the-flap book? I was halfway through reading her Don't Let the Pigeon Stay Up Late (very cute, by the way) when the little girl appeared next to us. She wanted to hear the story, too. There were just two problems: (a) she was unsupervised again, and (b) she had a big foam rocket in her mouth. I have no idea where this rocket came from, but I assume she didn't bring it in herself.
But now we wake at break of day,
They had so much fun creating their Angry Birds! They pasted their creations onto a worksheet that I printed up, then they had to use the word bank at the bottom, to answer the question of which shapes they used and how many of each shape... (Don't you just love it when you provide a word bank....but they don't even look at it *sigh*)
with gouda
Okee-dokee. I won't be doing that again. I'm thrilled it's over and I'm glad to have five courses out of the way in 2.5 months but it was brutal. I was cranky and irritable and Baby Kitty thinks that I don't love him.
At some point the dream basically became the TV show The Walking Dead, without zombies & with flying machines & unknown beings instead, and even most of the cast from that TV show were in the dream with me; and we were trying to survive & avoid the machines & whatever else the spaceship-like things sent down.
I drew both pictures using a red china marker, inked it wit a black Pitt artists pen, and put the finishing touches with the airbrush tool found in Art Studio for iPad.
Rnd 11: ch 3, dc in next 69 dc; join with sl st to 1st dc (70 dc)
David & Goliath No Contest- Hidden Pictures: Explore Hidden Treasures in God’s Word Grace 1 - 3 by Linda Standke, page 10
I don’t know what’s wrong with me. I just accidentally crushed a snail and it made me cry. I’ve always been a sensitive person…but come on. I’d be laughing at myself right now if I wasn’t crying.
Someone (I'm guessing without kids) wrote and told me something along the lines of, "You'd better not let your kids make too much noise on the plane. There's nothing worse than a parent who was irresponsible and had more kids than they can control."
What were some of my favorite restaurants of the past year?
3. a reasonably accurate flashing red "Bullshit Detector" light to be built into all TVs in order to warn The Audience when whatever they are watching is stretching the boundaries of fact or credulity.
Physical/mental/emotional abuse
“She needed a bargaining chip and this was it. Raif’s daughter’s life for hers. And he knew damn good and well I was right. Just like he’d assured me the night I’d killed Azriel, this was far from over. His daughter was alive, I knew it. And I was going to find her.”
I started with the steak tartare.
They both laughed.
When I first started reading it I had the very same question. Initially, I started with Genesis reading up to Chapter 30 (I believe) before I stopped. I should mention that was just in one sitting. If you never have read that might it is easy to become overwhelmed.
life as a boy. In my mind, it defined, more than
If you're a beadweaver, or would love to learn how to use those itty bitty seed beads, Kristen's tutorial is a great place to start! http://kristen-beadjourney.blogspot.com/p/store.html
"Good bye," she said.
To celebrate this beautiful Friday evening (aren't Friday's just the best of days?) I have a FREE printable for you!
I am wondering how hard it would be to with a chop saw, basic pine 1x6's sanded really well, and then using this VERY EASY fab weathering technique from Frugal Farmhouse...
2. Trucking: “I am a vagabond and a loner. Trucking is a good job for me. The time on the road clears my mind.” -Lordsburg, New Mexico—Love’s Gas and Travel Center
In conclusion, data protection complaints to an authority such as the EDPS vary as much as the general subject matter of data protection. Whether people don’t have access to their personal information, whether their sensitive data is published or whtether they are being surveilled in an office without knowing, they feel like their privacy is being invaded and they want to react somehow. Nevertheless, it is clear that the right to data protection is not an absolute one. In case I.1. from above, the individual did not have the right to simply modify data concerning his health, even though the modification was meant for his own medical file. Health is a sensitive subject matter and keeping track of one’s medical condition is important, even though the medical condition changed. It would be interesting to know more facts from this particular case to analyze in depth this limit of the right to data protection.
The magic is in the construction of the bullet. It's not cast lead, perhaps with a copper jacket. It's completely different than that, being 'pressed' together out of powdered copper and tin. Yes... the bullet is made of powdered metal. It's formed together under heavy pressure to take the shape of a bullet. That's where it all happens, because when that pressed together frangible bullet strikes a target harder than itself, it suddenly drops back into it's original components... IE; powdered metal.
Then one moment chilled my spine. It was the reported words of some of the coaches saying if the NHL isn’t going to do something, we’re going to have to do it ourselves. But if they take it into their own hands, how far does that go?
I'm 23 years old and I've given up hope on finding the elusive Mr. Right, A.K.A. Prince Charming. I am fairly convinced that the Disney Prince Charming that was hammered into my brain as a little girl is really just a big farce that has completely distorted my perception of what I should look for in a man.
Ambitious Senator Carinna knows something must be done: erratic young Caligula Caesar, the new Emperor, needs a companion and confidant. Carinna’s older son, groomed for the job, is dead – leaving only bad-boy Marcus, who has just returned from the German frontier trailing minor clouds of glory. And a hostage.
I saw a woman one time crossing with her FIVE kids right in the middle of that big roundabout she almost got her whole family killed
Beneath barely-read books, tubes of Carmex and crumpled up Kleenex, I found a pen and scrap paper in my bedside drawer. Recalling every ounce of music theory I managed to retain from college (which isn't much), I jotted down the words, notes & rythym. And happily, I fell back asleep.
Today’s prayer: Lord, please have mercy on Your child, Geraldine, and welcome her to a joyful reunion with the family who preceded her into Your Kingdom. Please comfort her husband and her son, and all of us who mourn her passage from this world. Please soften the hearts of those who refuse to mourn, and fill them with Your loving grace.
Perhaps the most abstract works in the show, Horizont 1, B11, 2011, and Eis (Ice), B11, 2011, give us the overall theme: we think we see something; we try to make it out, but ultimately any attribution of meaning or cultural positioning to the blurred image is speculation and projection by the viewer. Writers are fond of quoting Duchamp’s “The spectator makes the picture” when faced with Havekost work, and rightly so—you can certainly see these works as the flotsam of an over-mediated culture, an overly cropped, positioned, strategized, and interpreted society that is more uncertain of its own meaning and story as ever. Havekost redeploys (another hip term) the flotsam as representations of us, of us that cannot represent much of any truth other than our failure to find coherence in a troubling world. In failing to represent, he shows representation’s doom of continual failure.
Just look at that cheesy yumminess! A good breakfast is always a great start to the day~
Michael Hutchence chose the pseudonym “Patricia” for his mother after I told him how I earned money to attend the Def Leppard concert. On Saturday, before the concert, I worked in my mom’s real estate office answering phones and learning the filing system from the Broker and co-owner of the real estate firm’s daughter, Patricia. My mom’s former broker, Glenn, passed away yesterday and this is part of his obit.
I don’t think the bus driver stopped as my attacker repeatedly unfurled punches into my stomach. He came back for another round in the playground the next day as I played jump rope with some friends in the playground. This time I was ready and delivered him a very satisfying punch in the eye. I made him cry and it felt good. I wised up and took the early shift bus home that afternoon. He never bothered me again.
Better get to it!
Assess the needs of the individual and family. Whether agents are working with prospects or clients, it’s essential to under-stand their current and future goals. Are they still in their prime earning years and interested in wealth accumulation or are they retired and seeking wealth protection or a tax-efficient way to leave an inheritance? Perhaps, they’re worried about outliving their assets. Each person’s situation is unique and being a careful listener and probing for information will provide the agent with valuable information. Once agents are familiar with their clients’ goals, family dynamics and resources, they can “solve for the need” with appropriate life insurance products.
Even worse, when you explain that your child has autism, these people either deny the diagnosis or back away as if there's a chance it could be catching.
It doesn’t really matter what type of music they have played or are continuing to play. Darkthrone has been one of the most influential black metal bands to date.
Alright ya'll so I didn't just get engaged today but last Sunday my sweet, sweet boyfriend proposed to me and it was just as I could have dreamed of as a little girl! We went to the place where one of our first dates was on the Blue Ridge Parkway... a tiny fishing dock down a hiking trail. He had packed a picnic lunch (complete with champagne, apples and cheese). It started raining so we had to relocate and finish our picnic on the back porch -- but that was okay, too! I knew it was coming sometime in the next few months, but I had no idea it would be then! I am so happy and excited for this new chapter of our lives together! We haven't set a date yet but decided that next summer (i will be graduating in May, hopefully getting a teaching job, moving to a new place, figuring out grad school stuff, etc) would not be the best time. SO, nothing wrong with a little bit longer engagement... I think we've decided on June 2013... gives me a little more planning time. Since I am a perfectionist.. I need ample time to get things just right AND it would be compatible with school summer breaks! Enough of that-- just wanted to share my excitement!
To their credit (yes, I know, gee thanks), North Carolina is the only state to openly acknowledge their racist eugenics program and acknowledge that it was wrong, and offer some form of recompense other than a blanket apology.
After her introduction, the ‘survival game’ is introduced – Deus is dying, and to prevent the world dying with him he must select a successor. He chooses to give future diaries to 12 people, and pit them against each other – last one standing wins. They are unaware of who each other is so must try and find out. They are also each dubbed with a pseudonym – Yukiteru is First, Yuno is Second and so forth up to Twelfth.
Sure enough, a bird pooped on her head. A bird actually pooped on her head! How often does something like that happen?
Tomorrow we are going grocery shopping to re-stock the fridge with band friendly foods. I am looking forward to turning this around. I think I need to start logging my food again. I was most successful when logging my food. Yes, definitely need to log again.
Some of you might know by now I'm a Dr. Seuss fan. I am, I am. So, when my son told me about this great little video made at the Burning Man Festival using the Dr. Seuss book, "Oh, the Places You'll Go!" I knew I had to watch it. Then share it. You probably already know about the festival, so I won't go there, and maybe you even know about this video and I'm way behind the curve, but just in case that's not the case, I'm posting it.
(352) 505-3035
There are 2 things I look for when I read blogs and comments. I ask myself, is what this person writing an "Instrument of Education" or a "Weapon Taking Aim"? It really is that simple.
Michael Emmett Brennan, 27, New York, N.Y.
Don't YOU want to live forever?
Many are speaking of really feeling the changes in and around them and veils are opening. Always always surrender to the process and to the love of the Divine Mother and keep a watch on that internal dialogue. It is such a small step, but it has such great effects in your life. When the critical mind is switched off, you can get a glimpse of the peace which is you and your true nature!
17. What are three things you can do differently when it comes to food?
The Mets? They're a different story.
Here is my Christmas card!!
For him to pay Tomorrow.
Fri 10/17 Boise, ID Knitting Factory
ISBN: 978-978-50920-9-7
It was a lovely way of spending an hour on a train. The man’s son, Harrison, aged five, was trying to read every word he could see, and chanting sums. “The whole carriage does not want to hear your sums”, said his mother. I said I liked hearing his enthusiasm. “Let’s have a Pizza!” says Harrison. “Is that what you want?” said his father, seriously: it seems Harrison gets an appropriate part in the family decision making.
I am thankful for my two beautiful daughters, my granddaughter, and my amazing, supportive, partner in life.
What's happening in New York City is happening everywhere, folks. Our heritage, our individualism, our craftmanship are getting wiped out by corporate chains, feckless capitalism, and the governments that support them. Goodbye Troy Pork Shop, Hello Price Chopper!
"Hello, my name is Islay," announces the dog in that trademark deep voice. "…Because of the many good deeds I’ve done for deaf and blind children, I have been given the power of speech." But only since 1998. Although the well was officially launched in 1987 as part of the QVB refurbishment, the dog was voiceless. Laws agreed to help the Institute who thought the voice would attract more donations. Laws accepted the task, as well as agreeing to the pièce de résistance: two barks at the end of the routine as thanks.
“Sounds a bit daffy.”
3. Businesses, both on-line and offline are coping with actual people. In the case of on-line businesses, you will usually discover unethical practices or scams all all through the net. Make it possible for what you are promoting idea shouldn’t be much like them. Is your product/service simple, lazy, vanity, or trick-like? You must reply this question earlier than you set your corporation plans into action.
You may not always agree with your employees’ behavior, but it is important that you always value and support who they are as people.
* Buy me drinks and otherwise be emotionally supportive.
Don't do step aerobics on crack
Argh.
When Michelle was first telling me about this jewelry line, she told me that every single piece of jewelry, headband, clips, etc. was only $5.00! You are probably thinking like I first did that it’s too good to be true, right? That because it’s so inexpensive it’s probably lacking in quality. Well, now that I have held several pieces in my hands, I can assure you that it is NOT lacking in quality. It’s the same type of jewelry I’ve bought at boutiques in the mall and paid triple the price for. It’s good stuff and would make a great Christmas gift for family, friends, co-workers, teachers, etc. Click below to go to the Jewelry for Five website and check out Michelle's awesome selection of jewelry and accessories.
This past week, i called Ephraim my, "Sugar baby, honey, honey..." and tickled and kissed him till he squealed. He drooled all over me and waged war with his big brother to find a spot on my lap. All seven of you kids crowded into my room and snuggled under blankets laughing and talking and making movie watching virtually impossible. This is the scene in our home these days... a family, in varying degrees of maturity and growth. We live in the prairie city of Calgary in the wide expanse of land that is the country of Canada.
Fish is still alive after trip to Walmart.
An example of how the wax mattered is clear in an element of the game called "blasting", at least that's what we called it. "Blasting" was when you used your cap to knock another players cap with as much force as possible so their cap was at least pushed out of your way and if possible sent into another dimension.
I'm a friendly person but I don't just walk up to someone while they are eating dinner and talk to them when I have no clue who they are.
First and foremost I am passionate about my children. Motherhood changed me forever ... it gave me a sense of being and a sense of purpose. I realized that their lives were much more important than my own and I learned the art of self less ness. - I will never forget someone comparing a mother walking through a mall with her small children (and I have 3!) to a mother duck with her ducklings following. (Now that you know this check it out... it is so true!)
It’s come up a couple of times in recent conversations: how I want to step things up with my blogs, how I can see the potential for getting more (income, creativity, freedom) out of them … if only I had the time. Compared to when I started blogging five years ago, there’s much more opportunity for me these days as blogger. I’m seeing a steady flow of sponsored content and ads coming my way, the invites, scoops and proposals I receive are bigger and better than ever before and – perhaps most importantly – my skills as a writer and photographer have improved greatly due to all my online publishing activity.
Look at that list.
If there was dessert, it was usually bread pudding, which was made form day-old French bread bought for a song from the local grocery. That was a special treat for all when Papa allowed a splash of whisky in it!
The print run for the book is underway and the teaser book trailer is complete. The trailer will be distributed on multiple sites in mid May. Shadows of Kings should also be listed on Amazon.com pretty soon as well. Release date is still set for June 15th. Whew!
How did the Universe provide, you ask? We have known this one family since Son was 1.5 years old. There is a same age boy as Son, a fabulous Friend Mom and interesting Dad, a fun daughter who passes down many clothes to my Daughter, and a younger person as well. Friend Mom and I have maintained our friendship through the Pink Shirt incident (teasing about boys wearing pink), kids avoiding each other, disinterest, and many years. Friend Mom came over to our house monday to hang out with Son and Daughter while I went on a date with my husband. First one without kids since we had kids! Wouldn't you know it but Friend Mom's son (M) and daughter (A) came with her to play. All kids and adults had a fabulous time that night. M asked when he could come back. Tuesday of course! M came over yesterday for about 3.5 hrs and again Son and M had a great time. Today Son gets to see his cool friend C which is super cool because we had to go more than a week without seeing C and his family due to illness.
I'm not sure how old the pattern is, but I'm calling the jocks vintage, just because the pattern photo is so old fashioned looking. I made view C, the jocks on the far left of the photo for my 8yo boy.
Clooney’s Oscar-nominated “The Descendants” had the first public showings at the Festival. He plays Matt King who considers himself the “backup parent” of his 17 and 10 year-old daughters. His wife is seriously injured in a boating accident and Matt must reconnect with his daughters. When his older daughter tells him that her mother was unfaithful, they begin a search for her lover. Matt is also the sole trustee to determine if a large tract of family land, acquired when an ancestor married into the Hawaiian royal family, will be sold.
"General Petraeus’s aides now privately call him 'Dave the Dull,' and say he has largely muzzled himself from the fierce public debate about the war to avoid antagonizing the White House, which does not want pressure from military superstars and is wary of the general’s ambitions in particular."
Online Masters Degree in business administration and management can be done in various colleges and universities. Graduate courses provided by such colleges and institutions allow you to earn units and carry out graduate work in business administration. Online MBA degree program focuses on an area of specialization such as marketing, accounting or finance option. This may depend on the curriculum you prefer to study. MBA degree can help you to climb up the corporate ladder in your work place.
experience in field photography. The core philosophy is that the outdoors is a great classroom and photography is best learnt by exploring it with a camera.
I got to thinking about how old Coat was as I approached my latest birthday. I realised that Coat had journeyed with me for over half my life. And it has been the interesting half. The half when I stepped into the big bad world. The half when I discovered that I needed to change careers every five minutes. The half when I loved, lost and finally loved again.
Peter Schiff: Look, Ben Bernanke and the Federal Reserve will keep printing money to try to get Americans to spend. Ben Bernanke said that the problem with the economy is that Americans are not borrowing and spending as much as they were before the crisis. Well, where were Americans getting all the money from to borrow and spend? It was from a real estate bubble.
Then adding oil to the pan and heating it up. Dunk dandelions in the batter, drop them carefully in the hot oil. Lucas was the hot oil tester, with a little bit of water to see if it’s hot enough. You need to try this few times, of course, and see how it sizzles.
SV: Well I think you saw it from a better angle than I did. The mirrors are not really big. I think everything went initially according to plan. We changed all three tyres except the rear left. It went on but I think it wasn’t tight yet and we put the car down, back on the floor. I saw it in the mirror that they realized it is not done yet so we had to put the car back up and lost a lot of time. Lost directly the position to Fernando in the pit-box and to Lewis on the circuit. Up to that stage I think it was a very good race. I had an excellent start and an excellent first stint. In these tricky conditions I was able to open a big, big gap which helped us for the rest of the race. Up to that point. It is difficult to say, as Fernando touched on, I think it would have been a tight race as Ferrari had very good pace and we have to respect that and take it into account. It was not just us maybe being unlucky or finishing second because of a mistake. I think especially Ferrari, especially Fernando, was very competitive today and it would have been a long way to the chequered flag. It was an exciting race with the conditions with one half completely wet – even struggling a bit and aquaplaning in places – and the other half dry, sunshine, on the same track. It is a bit funny. I think it can only happen around here. But it makes it very special to us as it makes it very tricky in these conditions. I think it was an exciting race. Then I lost a lot to Fernando behind Lewis. I couldn’t get past initially and it gets more difficult. I lost the front tyres right behind him as I was so close and it wasn’t easy to attack. I had one chance maybe into Copse but I think in hindsight my exit was too good so I ran into his back too soon on the straight and could not use the momentum. Then we got him at the stop but had to do a longer stint at the end. Mark was closing in, in the last three or four laps and he was quicker but we could stay ahead so a long race, a lot of things happened, easy to do a mistake again. We didn’t do many and a good result for the team with Mark coming in third. A podium here is always special. There are so many fans here. It is one the nicest in-laps or coming back to the pits after the chequered flag as you can really feel people are passionate about racing. Most of the cheers goes to Jenson (Button) and Lewis but even with not having the British flag on your car they love racing. It is great to stand on the podium and see that many people.
We should be able to pull the date of death for Peter Riley from the state registration. Which is odd, b/c he hasn’t shown yet.
The week before last, two of the UK's biggest ale brands launched their new advertising campaigns to beer writers and trade journalists. I was invited to one launch but, for some reason, not the other one the day after - even though seemingly everyone else who was at the first one was. Please believe me that this in no way colours what I'm about to say about these two campaigns. I'm bigger than that. No, really, I am, honest. But I tell you this so you can filter the following for any perceived prejudice.
Onyame is supreme and all-powerful. The creator of us all. Asasse Yaa –Mother Earth provides all that her children need.
6. Total project cost $ 9,200.00 Total eligible expense $ 9,200.00
England
nothing" Mary said, realizing she put her foot in her mouth again. Hesitantly she said "Johnny's coming over around 9 tonight for some pot roast would you like to come?” Not really wanting to face him but she figured it would seem less suspicious.
"I know this will sound crazy," Joe Maddon is saying now. He sits in the auditorium of his old high school, across the street from the house where he grew up, across the street from the Third Base Luncheonette where his mother still works, all of this in a little town in Northeastern Pennsylvania called Hazleton. "I don't have a bad memory from childhood. Not a single one. Oh, I mean, some bad things happened -- deaths in the family and so on -- but when it comes to growing up here, I only remember great things."
Avalanches
translated by Michael Hofmann
Be aware that pale colours are very see-through, and black is far more discrete. There are a couple of alternatives - underlining the lace, or adapting the pattern to have lace along the upper edge only - and I will show how to do this in the sew-along.
‘There is no evidence to say they were targeted because they were white,’ she said. ‘They were targeted because they were there.’
A simple mission turned deadly.
Critic’s Score: 7.8
DATA:
I left Canada, where I was born and started my journalism career, more than 20 years ago to live in the U.S. in a small town 25 miles north of New York City.
The Reporter Contest is turning out to be an unqualified success. But there is a problem. A lot of the entries did not follow the rules, so they were not included. Here are the rules again. Please note the bold text:
So I am grateful for my husband for allowing myself these unexpected opportunities. I am grateful for his gift of the gab. Meeting him, no matter how our relationship unfolds, has been a treasure.
I love that he listens to my thoughts and ideas and honestly believes I'm a genius.
these bright sparks are escalated up the ladder. Obviously nobody told
I'm planning on doing some shaking this year.
and they exhaust me!
Anyway, I am just going to name this little friend ‘Woody’, since this gate seems to be his/her hang out.
which is funny because he LOVES wearing necklaces and medals. the kid, at some point or another in the day, usually has something around his neck.
Claudia made this beatiful card and used white cotton zig zag lace, organza ribbon, natural button twine and mulberry pretty blossoms - isn't her colouring amazing!!
that soars in whatever sky
Environmental science faculty, staff, post docs and graduate students are encouraged to attend – FREE. Refreshments following the program.
The Moose were originally formed as an expansion team in St. Paul, Minnesota to fill the void created by the departure of the Minnesota North Stars to Dallas. After two seasons of play as the Minnesota Moose, speculation was that the Winnipeg Jets would be relocating to the Target Center in Minneapolis, Minnesota and a plan was put in place to avoid competing head to head with an NHL franchise by moving to the vacated Winnipeg market.
Pseudo-Chrys.: Otherwise: Luke has given the answer of their lips, Matthew that of their hearts. For some made answer openly contradicting Him, and saying, “God forbid,” but their consciences took it up with “He shall miserably destroy these wicked men.” For so when a man is detected in any wickedness, he excuses himself in words, but his conscience within pleads guilty.
Britain says the decade-long project will boost trade in the region by hundreds of millions of pounds each year by speeding up transport times, including at border crossings where lorries can wait for days to be allowed through.
February 5, 2011 (Sunday) 6:00 PM KST
CFL’s aren’t bright enough. They put out a hideous colour. And to get to that stage where you have not quite enough light, in the wrong colour, you have to wait about 20 minutes for them to warm up.
No! Really?
It is not known if “玩世不恭 is living in Singapore or China. In any case, his views do reflect the mentality of a certain proportion of mainland Chinese who continue to have a ‘superiority complex’ emanating from their ’5,000 years of civilization’ and despise Singaporeans as their ‘lesser brethren’.
We are back, after the long Thanksgiving break. Let's get down to business. Art business.
There is nothing wrong with African land, climate or soil. Africa is heaven-on-earth. The problem is not Africa. The problem is the Black African people.
'Except what?'
In his speech, President Obama said: “we are pursuing a negotiated peace. In coordination with the Afghan government, my Administration has been in direct discussions with the Taliban. We have made it clear that they can be a part of this future if they break with al Qaeda, renounce violence, and abide by Afghan laws. “
If you want to make sure you always have the latest and greatest features that your chosen smartphone operating system offers, you have no choice but to buy an iPhone. That’s because Android makers are very slow about updating their phones to Google’s latest Android OS releases–and sometimes don’t update their phones at all.
In Revelation, we do not rise to heaven, but heavens descends to us. As John says, “Behold, the dwelling of God is with men. He will dwell with, and they shall be his people, and God himself will be with them” (Revelation 21:3). So we ought to look forward with anticipating joy to this glorious union of heaven with earth.
Sounds like the title of an awful Hollywood slacker film.
‘Jail’ screams Frank as he punches his ball out to the fairway. Al duffs his hybrid and the ball trickles by me. I take out my 5-wood and sky it 150 yards. “That’s no way to start” grimaces Al as he walks by. Frank takes out his 6-iron and hits a nice shot. He earns the first GIR. Al takes another crack at it and he ends up right of the green. I had about 140 yards to the green so I decided to hit a strong 9-iron but lost it right. I end up chipping onto the green on 4.
I was wrapped up in 'Cloaked' and I'm eager to read more books by Alex Flinn. Lucky for me, I have a copy of 'A Kiss in Time' on hand.
Robbie Weinhardt DET W 5
Fini. While it may not make much sense, I'm glad that I was able to provide an unintelligible answer.
Once we arrived, the parametics and the sitter met us at the front door.
“Working with Steve Evetts was such an incredible opportunity for us,” says guitarist Nick Lambert. “Steve produced some of the most influential and important albums for all of us in this band, so having him be the one steering the ship on this album was just mind blowing. He definitely helped us put together an album that we really feel is exactly how Vanna was always meant to sound!”
The parade came to a halt around the fountain (another good reason to camp out there) but the band continued to play and several characters disembarked to interact with the crowd.
- Deadline for payment 29th of february 2012
Bobby Richardson played for the Yankees from 1955-66 and was an eight-time All-Star selection. He won five Gold Gloves; three World Series title and was actually the MVP of the 1960 World Series.
Another adventure of that ALVIN!! My kids love the chipmunks. I remember having a record album of their songs when I was a kid. I love that the next generation of kids can enjoy the chipmunks as well. My youngest laughed the most of course. I laughed quite hard when there was a reference to The Hobbit. Silly fun about talking chipmunks that should have a bit more discipline. But I guess when you have 6 talking chipmunks on vacation on a cruise, things are going to get a bit out of hand!!
And he feels sound. This was reinforced when he was good for an entire circle so I got off and removed his tack. He ran and ran and ran, (dripping with sweat and foam in a full winter coat, ugh) and for the first time since the injury stayed on the right lead for extended lengths of time. It was his right fore that was injured, and up till now would canter and gallop around on the left lead only.
If you would like to win a copy of Kate's new book, please complete the below form by midnight, April 15, 2012. US and Canada only.
I love honour and respect The trees and plants
MW. There are none. There’s nothing new.
Tear Pad: Manufacturer coupon that you tear from a pad near a related product inside a store. May be used at any store.
“And I tell you, ask and you will receive;
My mum is back down and during her visit with my brother she discovered the physical abuse my brother was going through. Such as my dad hitting him for no reason and scaring the shit out of him when he was a child. I remember always being intimidated by my dad and so was my brother.
but after living in a country where customer service is not really a priority,
The skald goes into a tawdry tale indeed of a woman foolishly freeing her father's enemy because he promised her a large bride-price. Although he paid her a large maiden-fee, he did not take her away to marry him, so she was dishonored before all of her family.
(Picture mine. Okay, it might look seriously scary at first, but it really does represent how it felt — like I was walking away from her and her bloodied mess of a life because it had hurt me so badly and I couldn’t take any more… but she was still there, needing help, on the ground, but I couldn’t make myself turn back)
We've done a few things differently this winter than we did other winters when we had them home. One of the biggest differences was that we rarely put them in. In the past, after about the first week of Oct., we'd lock them in their stalls every night and let them out in the morning. This year they may have been put in for the night about five times - only when it was REALLY cold or it was raining or snowing. They can go in on their own and we clean and bed their stalls everyday, but we don't lock them in. We're basing this on research reports we've read that it's healthier for them. This is very easy for us to do, because their stall doors open onto their turn out. They have heated buckets in their stalls and we can feed them in their stalls or throw hay outside on nice days.
wanted, and they had bikes and kayaks as well, but
2) I don't get the excitement. My mum is suspiscious of fairs, circuses, carousels and doesn't like them. So we didn't grow up with them, (no hardship really), and I didn't taste my first toffee apple or candy floss until I'd left home (nevermind). Who knows why she was uneasy? I'm still a little afraid of her, so I won't be asking. Perhaps I've inherited her concerns.
79. The Perfect Storm (Mark Wahlberg) – No fishing boats for me.
contact me @worldtechguru on Twitter.
‘I can see the colours of your veins,’ she says. ‘I can hear the pattern of your blood.’
FINAL RATING: 5.5/10
Louis' advice for other people who want to make a living from their craft?
And a ham bone, even a pedigree ibérico de bellota ham bone, is still a bone, and you can´t get more austere than that. It can only be used for broths and bean soups, but is guaranteed to lift them and give them a luxurious, velvety depth.
What is so awesome about Grammarly is that it does more than point out the errors: it tells you how to correct them with detailed error descriptions and correction advice, and citation suggestions, and even provides vocabulary enhancement tools.
Her broken sunglasses
Age was another factor. It’s always played a bigger than necessary role in my life rearing its ugly head whenever I’d decide to be hard on myself for one thing or another.
WOW!!! Look at this GIANT palette of boxes that arrived today...it was so tall, that the delivery guy had to leave it right outside the door! What could it be? Paper? Flowers? Embellishments?
There are all kinds of gospel-connections in life just waiting for you to pounce on them. Last night as we were at the table eating dinner, one of my boys reached over to the fridge and pulled off a magnet we bought at the Houston Museum of Natural Science which had a butterfly printed on it. He asked, “What’s this?” ”A butterfly”, I said, “Do you know what butterflies were before they were butterflies?” Both my boys said, “No”, so I went to their bedroom and grabbed a book off their shelf. If you’ve been to a public library in the last forty years you know about The Very Hungry Caterpillar by Eric Carle. I moved quickly through the book until I reached the climax where the caterpillar, engorged by fruit, hot dogs, and chocolate cake, wraps himself in a cocoon. The next page reveals the drastic transformation the caterpillar made into a beautiful butterfly. What a sweet opportunity the Lord provided for me to explain to my kids the doctrine of regeneration – “When we run to Jesus to be saved from our sin, like the caterpillar, God transforms us into beautiful new creatures on the inside (2 Corinthians 5:17). He gives us new hearts that love him and want to serve him.”
2. Wainscot paint: Acadia White (AC-41); Benjamin Moore.
As the MMO’s rushed into my asshole, it convulsed as it greedily accepted them. I clung to her and shuddered over and over again. The long fingers of her pleasure were deep in my anal cavity and they were coaxing stroking and squeezing my anguished prostate. It relinquished its pleasure and wept a stream of precum in her pussy. The spasms did not let up, they continued for some amount of time. I lost track as they drove me deep and deeper into euphoric haze.
Using a large dough scoop or spoon, scoop scones onto baking sheet lined with parchment paper. Sprinkle tops with cinnamon sugar mixture if desired. Bake in 350 degree oven for about 20 minutes, or until slightly golden on top. Makes 10-12 scones.
The proposal to disperse sulphur dioxide in an attempt to reflect sunlight was again raised in a London Guardian article this week entitled, Geoengineering: The radical ideas to combat global warming, in which Ken Caldeira, a leading climate scientist based at the Carnegie Institution in Stanford, California, promotes the idea of injecting the atmosphere with aerosols.
1 I just found on a table outside the main ballroom where most of the evening events were held.
Keith drew a breath of satisfaction. Almost sucking in his own victory along with the evident awe now in abundance at his detective work.
Ironically, in 2002, the owner of the bone box reportedly claimed that he withheld his name from public media because he feared his home would become a church where those seeking a tangible connection to Christ would venerate the ossuary.
08. Remember Me (quietly remix by I, PARASITE)
from when you were in my shoes.
God does some amazing things that prompt us to desire the same thing in our life! We call out and ask Him for these things but when they come we often do not recognize it. When we do get what we want we recognize the incredible amount of faith it actually requires! We get scared in the situations because they are so much bigger then us! We have to rely on God when we are doing His work! If we do not need to rely on Him then the work is just not big enough! When we start to doubt we start to drown in the overwhelming circumstances. Even in the doubt and even with us taking our eyes off of Him…. He will never let us go under.
Kino is the longeest running short film nights in Manchester and the North West, we’ve been running these nights for over fifteeen years in an assorment of venues, and our latest venue the Black Lion is centrally located and walkable from the centre of Manchester.
Greg Koch, CEO and Co-Founder Stone Brewing Co., launched the brewery in 1996 with Steve Wagner, President and Co-Founder, in San Marcos, California.
Where is the fish sourced for the Omega Vitals?
Eddie Izzard stands out as the peg-legged pirate Long John Silver, but the rest of an excellent cast also makes a distinct personality of each character. Toby Regbo plays young Jim Hawkins, the innkeeper’s son whose discovery of a map sets off a long sea voyage from England to find buried treasure on a tropical Island. Elijah Wood, his enormous eyes painted like a peacock’s, is Ben, a castaway who prefers cheese to pearls and holds the final secret to the treasure.
I got my big brother to buy it!
Some diet tips to get rid of belly fat are to eat fiber in meals, eat foods low in calories, maintain proper fruit diet and drink natural green tea as well as applying other convenient methods.
City Council Member David Yassky reminded Taylor of concerns that streets might have to close, as in Newark, given that the glass-walled Atlantic Yards arena would be set back the same distance from the street. Taylor said the ESDC had been briefed by the New York Police Department, which is “100 percent comfortable with security measures.”
The belt serves to cinch the waist and give some shape to the dress. I chose to pair it with my black boots rather than with nude wedges to make it a little less summery and airy. If I were headed to the beach (I wish) I would totally wear this (minus the belt) with wedges, or better yet, flip flops. But since it’s not June yet, and I don’t want to look like I’m going to the beach for my internship, the black boots make the dress more city appropriate.
I guess he is, after all, just FIVE years old. And I really didn't actually think he'd remember for that long...I just figured it would have been long enough for me to use the bathroom for heaven's sake!
1 scrivening
To me, this sounds like a world better than the one we live in, maybe it is because I do not believe in borders or barriers, though they are sometimes necessary. Would you want to live in such a world or do you believe that it would make all of mankind worse off?
I was supposed to be trying to lose some of this excess weight but, after I had real trouble trying to include an extra page on my blog, I seem to have just given up the ghost! But I've been practising today, so I think I've got the page thingy sorted. (Check it out tomorrow) So I'm going to start eating a little more carefully from tomorrow. And to that end, I have sorted my freezer out and given it a clean. I had to throw quite a bit out because I had no idea how long some of the stuff had been in there and I wasn't prepared to risk salmonella or worse! But now I've got a clean freezer and I know what's in it.
OTHER
film is because it never lost sight of the fact that it was a horror film at its core, that it used its self-referential humor to draw attention to the horror that was unfolding rather than to draw attention to the high-brow concept of its slasher self-awareness itself. Whedon and Goddard are so fully immersed in their concept, they lose sight of this and forget to actually scare or even playfully wink at their audience along the way, opting instead to clobber us over the head with their self-satisfaction and cleverness.
Our projects for this hop clearly had to be marriage related so i have chosen to show you 2 scrap layouts from my wedding day and one from my mum and dads 25th anniversary which has a photo from their wedding day
"Well, that's right, you can ask God for that, but He wants your toenails to keep growing."
"My brother was in the 34th Evacuation Unit" he says. " Oh yeah?" I say back and then suddenly the "Oh Yeahs" are flying back and forth- like missles over the sea of Japan."
* find POCO not here (because its on the NAB LIST)
"I'm advertising a book signing."
This is strange and can mean only one of two things: either the app doesn’t work, or I haven’t been putting in everything I’ve been eating.
According to the draft NAMA Business Plan in October 2009, 67% of assets backing NAMA loans were located in Ireland and 27% were located in the UK. The remaining 6% were located elsewhere – although the US and Canada were given prominence by some, it seems that 0.5% is located in Eastern Europe. Frankly rest of world could cover any number of countries – Irish developers were active in any number of countries outside Ireland/UK/US/Canada/Eastern Europe including Cape Verde, South Africa, United Arab Emirates, Turkey, Spain, France, Germany, India, China, Vietnam, Brazil (and that’s by no mean a comprehensive list). There has been no definitive update on the location of the property securing the NAMA loans since last October 2009 so the index assigns a weighting by territory of 71% to Ireland (67% plus 2/3 of the 6% that was designated Rest of World) and 29% to the UK (27% plus 1/3 of the 6% that was designated Rest of World). Slides used by the NAMA CEO and Chairman in Kerry and Galway respectively in September 2010 are still showing the same geographical split as in the draft Business Plan.
Judge Shira has spoken, and Viktor Bout has been sentenced to 25 years in federal prison. The fact that this is the minimum sentence mandated by law ought to tell you something about what the judge thinks of the federal government’s case. In her remarks at sentencing, Judge Scheindlin came just about close to calling it outright entrapment as judicial ethics will permit:
So where do I begin in this quest? And where do I end? Do I tell them about violent pornography and pedophilia? Do I give them the full truth and details of mass murder, torture and cruelty? Do I tell them the details of the Holocaust? Do I explain the pain of dying from cancer? That’s the truth isn’t it? Of course I don’t, and in the moment that I censor any of that ‘truth’, I’m presenting a modified and incomplete vision of the world and its reality to my children. (And in my opinion, quite rightly so.)
Valentines Day post-flower shop was a romantic affair. I went to a friend's house for her annual 30 person dinner party and passed out with exhaustion on the sofa a half an hour in. Micha and I went back to my house at midnight where I cleaned up the week's flower squalor and packed up a suitcase straight until 4am when a car arrived to ferry us to the airport. Middle seated and Mexico bound, I was asleep before take-off and ended up face down on the tray table not long after. You guys wore me out, and thank you for that.
We have a fiscal deficit that badly needs to be addressed, but we also have investments that need to be made that can't just be put off. Why is it so difficult to acknowledge that investing in our infrastructure, mass transportation, green energy and other industries of the future is a bad thing? If you own a company, would you stick your head in the sand and ignore new markets and improving your products? No, unless you're not very bright. You'd understand that is the key to being relevant and growing. This country is no different. If you don't get the concept of "spending money to make money", then you're truly stupid.
I did another transfer on an old label using another skeleton from one of Retro's Halloween sheet. I put another stencil cut-out with it to tie it together with the other transfer.
The dominant ideology in Western nations is built around multi-racialism or anti-racism, and is a variant of Nazism. The motive is to push “Whites” out of their own communities, and it is done by deceit and against democratic principles or rule of law.
Noon Gathering– 12:15 PM
I've been a fan of Bob's blog for a long time. His wit and insight into the business of advertising is spot on. If you, like me, have worked in the industry long enough to see the shenanigans done by agencies and clients, you will laugh at plenty of the contents of his book. Advertising is a business that is always ripe for satire and criticism which is what Bob does in spades.
Ingenious as they may be, I realized, most of these traditions aren’t really foreign at all. They are masterfully refined variations on classic American good sense. Mean to promote thrift, community, and individual backbone, versions of these customs lie packed away in every American’s family tradition.
We have reached Denali before 5PM, right on time before all the administrative offices close. Getting the campground was easy – we got Riley Creek Campground tent only walk-in – basically we could camp, but couldn’t park the car there, not a big deal. However, figuring out what to do was a challenge. The main limiting factor was Igor’s flight on Saturday evening. Since there was no driving in the Denali proper we had to adjust to the schedule of the backpacker bus. The only bus that could fit was the first one leaving the end – Wonder Lake Campground – at around 5AM. We could just flag it on the road, but there is no guarantee that there would be space in it. So, the only option left was to camp one night at the furthest developed point in the park - Wonder Lake Campground.
Mindful of the necessary lead time and of the likely resurgence in demand during 2012, it would be desirable that these measures be put into effect before, at the latest, September of this 2011 year, the better to aid suppression of any resurgence of speculation in new dwellings.
NA: Lucky, and a success to boot. How is fame treating you?
I've seen my brothers working
You’re pissin me off, your all in danger.
I'm tired of being told that "race doesn't matter" in the post-racial world of Obama, when it's all that matters in affirmative action jobs, lower college admission and graduation standards for minorities (harming them the most), government contract set-asides, tolerance for the ghetto culture of violence and fatherless children that hurts minorities more than anyone, and in the appointment of U . S . Senators from Illinois.
But let’s come back to this episode. Pushed to the brink, Quarles brings together the three key players of this year: Raylan, Quarles and Limehouse. Raylan just wants to bring his man in to justice. Limehouse wants to get rid of Quarles so Noble’s Holler can go back to dealing with its own problems, separate from the interfering, extremely white man. And Quarles wants his f–king money. Quarles should have known it would not end well for him, but I’m not sure he could have realized just how badly. No matter how cartoonish it is to see his arm cut clean through, it is a moment of such pure violence that I held my breath. Everyone involved, Raylan included, seems shocked that everything that’s lead to this point could end with such a decisive and unexpected move. Quarles falls, and his story is done, left to bleed on the slaughterhouse floor.
- dEV
‘So Lupin we honour the cry of the wolf
Some of these figures baffle me, because I am reliably informed that most of these officials travelled with spouses and companions….further, the PM also carried her pundit on this trip…so what was the fee for his services?
So Brandom starts with inference. That’s our first point.
A smile relaxes your muscles, the frown on the forehead just disappears and the face is at its best. Smiles are infectious. You smile and look at someone, they smile back. It’s the easiest way to pass some happiness around.
* 1 egg
For 80 DeKalb, as HFA's Lentz explained, HFA requires that affordable units be located up to at least 60% of the building floors. (In a 34-story building like this, that means affordable units must be located up to at least the 20th floor. City programs are more stringent, involving 80% of the building's floors.) Also, on no floor can more than 50% of the units be affordable.
We've slowly been working through Lord Save Us From Your Followers by Dan Merchant during Adult Sunday School at church. I've mentioned my absolute, undying love for the book on the blog before, and I'm so glad Justin's dad was willing to try something that's a little out of the box for a few weeks--it has been such a blessing to me, and fits so well with our last study on Galatians.
Reading John Ray's September 4, 2007 critique of the Pyszczynski et al. claim that fear of death is behind conservatism, I couldn't help but analyze data from the NORC General Social Survey, one of the most respected databases of U.S. public opinion in existence, to further explore the matter. In fact, the GSS data completely support Dr. Ray's conclusion that there are no meaningful differences whatsoever in how liberals and conservatives view death. Again, the received "wisdom" concerning the psychology of conservatism espoused by Pyszczynski and academic social science in general, is shown to be speculative and fails to survive even moderate scrutiny.
Here are a just a few ways that you can use search marketing techniques to promote your book on Amazon:
that no one squashes it. You understand,
Toddlers, preschoolers and autistic children all share one thing in common: they are notoriously picky eaters! My doctor told of an autistic patient who ate virtually nothing aside from French fries! This child had grown in to a tall healthy young man despite his limited nutrient supply, but I’m not confident the same will be true for my child.
may a flock of colours,
As I write this I'm sipping on a Yona Yona Ale, one of the few micros widely distributed across Japan. Here in Ise, it's sold at a few grocery stores and even one convenience store.
I am not alone in my opinion of this album, either. Evan Sawdey (writer for PopMatters) had the following to say: “this is the sound of Death Cab at their most generic, disjointed, and disinterested. It’s a hard pill to swallow, but the truth is this: Codes & Keys is the worst album of their career”.
The firm already provides balloting for overseas U.S. military and civilian voting in nine states along with elections technologies in several districts
He drives Miss T home from school, goes to teacher/parent meetings, picks Mater T up from Scouts, does the shopping and washing (Hmmm, I'm a bit OCD about my washing and after my good Witchery T-shirts were put in the dryer.....), takes Master T BMX riding for h-o-u-r-s, even arranged a run with Miss T this morning at 5.30!! Look I know that to some of you this sounds perfectly normal but in my family the Silver Fox has always worked long hours and was just not around for all the usual stuff. When they asked him to work on Saturday he said 'I have missed more than 9 months of Saturdays with my family, I won't be working Saturdays'. or words to that effect. He is also less stressed and is so relaxed.
singer-songwriters like Mary Margaret O'Hara and Jane
The Philippine Senators, in their celebrated investigations, had long been shaking us – emotionally and mentally.
(In these I had crispy bacon bits, butter, garlic, cream cheese, parmigiano, black and white pepper and chili flakes).
SUBJECT: REQUEST TO EFFECT AN APPOINTMENT THAT IS IN DEVIATION TO THE EE PLAN OF THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONAL SERVICES: MR PJ DAVIDS: ASD HR ADMINISTRATION: ALLANDALE MANAGEMENT AREA: WESTERN CAPE REGION
Figure 1: Charting UK debt-to-GDP, the budget deficit, RPI, GDP growth and the unemployment rate. Source: OECD.
Using this handy treadmill pace/speed/distance conversion chart from Read.Write.Run.Mom (thanks!) I set the treadmill to 5.6 mph (to achieve the stated 6:36/km on my training plan) and off I went. 10 mins later (when I would normally walk) I was feeling fine. At 15 mins, still feeling okay. By 20 mins, I was still going and before I knew it, the 4km was done. My first continuous run since I started running in 2008! Sounds dumb, but to me that's actually a huge accomplishment. I definitely felt increased stress/strain in my ankles and especially my back but after a good stretch and a roll I felt good again.
Here is the story.
In fact, allow me to suggest a few:
Mommy, Daddy, and Griffin are leaving for Colorado today. We’ll be gone for a whole week. That seems like such a long time to be away from you. But Grandma has volunteered to be here with you so that you can stay on a schedule and not get sick on the plane. You’ll probably never read this letter because I’m sure we’ll all come home safe and be together with you again, but there are some things I want you to know, just in case.
Just what is active consciousness?
When the international community convenes in the next couple of years to decide a post 2015 development strategy, it is important that it take on board the dangers of promoting quantitative goals while ignoring the importance of human rights in empowering people living in poverty.
We are off to our next stop. Where? You’ll see. You just have to wait and come back here to see where we are next!!
Showcasing Gingerbread Girl with you is my pleasure, she is perfectly scrummy to colour and looks fabby coupled with some of my new christmas papers and of course some BLING!
One of the things I asked Peter before embarking on the trip up to the Giant’s Causeway was where we stood with marching season. In the summer the protestant loyalists in the north march to celebrate William of Orange and his victories over the Irish throughout Derry and Belfast. Peter advised that marching season was over and it would be relatively safe to drive up into Ulster. As we continued through to County Antrim, we drove through a number of small towns that were flying the old Ulster banner and the Union Jack. There is something that feels sinister when one is driving through these towns while they’re bedecked with these flags. To be sure the different county flags are flying all over the Republic of Ireland but this seems to be more a show of support to either the Hurlers or Footballers more than a statement of defiance and that is what the flying of the old Ulster banner as opposed to the flag of Ulster province felt like from my standpoint. Ultimately, Sherri and I both felt that the landscape and the people in the south just felt more inviting than the north.
While the cheese was melting away in the oven, my younger child came home from school. I opened the door and just like every other day, I was greeted with a great smile from a very sweaty, dirty looking boy. The next moment, he let out a little squeal, "I smell pizza!"
“There was lots of wrapping up loose ends, and it was as much Russell T Davies saying goodbye as it was David Tennant. But it had some great moments and it was the right time to change.”
14. One thing I don’t like from Coron is that they always take very long time to serve food!!!! So need to manage our expectations when we order food.
As you have gathered, my academically dessicated brother and I do not get on…. it was ever thus. He is, however, to me…. an amuse bouche, and I do like to poke the odd academic occasionally, if you forgive the expression (in the circumstances) - so I like to draw him in when opportunity allows. I suspect that Kealey was having a laugh – but even I would not have ventured into that territory. It is quite possible that my fellow blogger Geeklawyer would have been happy to do so – but I must not encourage him any further in his ‘depravity’ – Geeklawyer’s that is, not the VC’s!
For any of the recipes, just mail me at peppercornmill AT gmail DOT com or leave a comment naming the dish you want a recipe for and I will be happy to mail it to you.
That prays to its God and dies.
A few months ago, Ren Allen and I had the opportunity to do a joint presentation at the Northeast Unschooling Conference entitled "Unschooling Myth Busters." It was very fun; we tackled myths such as TV, video games, bedtimes, socialization, and motivation, among others. It never ceases to amaze me just how many unschooling myths are out there, especially considering the fact that virtually everyone in the world was unschooled long before formal education systems came along. In my mind, unschooling is neither new nor radical; it is completely natural and has been in our world since the dawn of man.
Romans 12:21 Do not be overcome by evil, but overcome evil with good.
Level 4: STR: +12, Increases your attack speed.
What to include is up to you and the personality of your group. I've been in groups where people wanted shorter, simpler lessons and other groups where it was expected to jump through rings of fire to participate. My favorite group was a happy medium. We had a communicated expectation that each lesson would at least include a story (or scripture story) with visuals and some kind of activity/game/object lesson with visuals. Visuals would be colored and laminated. Lesson outline would be typed and in a sheet protector. Small pieces would be kept in ziploc bags. Black and white originals (see below) would be included. It took time and effort, but at the end they were well-rounded lessons and still among my most loved and well-used lessons.
First let me explain why I use the term ‘mythology’ instead of ‘history.’ Usually the term ‘mythology’ is used to describe the stories of gods and heroes told in times or places where the explanations of science do not predominate. What is sometimes lost in the retelling of the tales of Hercules or Prometheus or Beowulf is how these stories functioned in their time to explain how the world came to be what it is and why certain practices or institutions or values were important. Myths are mechanisms for transmitting cultural knowledge across generations. The ‘truth’ of a myth lies not in the factuality of the characters and places and dates it contains but in the themes and relations that play out within it.
“I think they made a terrible mistake,” White joked, before saying that the nomination belongs to all four female leads on the series.
So when my brother sent me a video by a group called Straight No Chaser for a song called “The Christmas Can Can” I knew I had to watch it. And I wasn’t disappointed. It’s hilarious. So for today’s Christmas post, I present to you “The Christmas Can Can”:
pushups (60 sec rest) 15, 17, 17, 20, 19
3) Pour into chilled crust. Bake at 325 degrees about 1 hour, 15 min or until center is almost set. Turn oven off and open door. Let the cake cool in oven (with door open) another 10 minutes. Take out of oven and cool on wire rack for an additional 45 minutes more. Chill in fridge at least 3 hours.
My deadlift felt so smooth following the squats. I was really motivated to pull today, and I FINALLY got a 505 deadlift (first time since I was throwing shot put in college back in 2007). If I had more time in class, I would have tried 515+. Extremely happy to pull that number.
Okay, that's it from me for now, enjoy the rest of your day!
to play same tricks together
Your happiness on this, your day,
I'm just unsocial I guess.
06 - Four Billion Cubic Kilometres of Shining Papyrus 1:30
The music goes with the frames, slowly proceeding, emphasizing and coloring them.
Meanwhile, the epic battle for the future of all worlds, modern and fairytale alike, is about to begin. For good to win, Emma will have to accept her destiny and fight like hell.
From castles rattled at the Diet of Worms
They carry echoes from another time, almost from another world, the sound grows fainter, but can still be heard if we choose to listen, and we must listen to those echoes before they, like so much else we once treasured and have now lost, fall silent.
You can feel
I love make up! ** ♥
Example: Michigan All-American defensive end Lamar Woodley is shown in a split screen view with USC offensive tackle Kyle Williams. You (aka me) as Woodley: “I think he’s a good man, I like him, I got nothing against him, but I’m definitely gonna make orphans of his children.”
How big a deal could they turn out to be?
Pour away the ocean and sweep up the wood.
Incidentally, I have lost an additional pound...so now, I'm down 15 lbs. total since I started back in the first week of January of this year!
Terry killed himself after releasing the animals.
Defeat as victory, hatred as the only way to a united Ireland, a lure for another generation's young men: "The victim's wheezy triumph." The 1981 hunger strikes eerily recall the desperation of 1920 for his generation fighting the British, and each other. Henry is pressured to inform by both sides, now the Irish police against Irish republicans. "I changed the tense from past to present and informed on people long dead."
For more than four decades Robert Adams has photographed the geography of the American West, finding there a fragile beauty that endures despite our troubled relationship with nature, and with ourselves.
“She was born with her eyes closed and a word on her tongue, a word she could not taste. Her name was Anidori-Kiladra Talianna Isilee, Crown Princess of Kildenree, and she spent the first years of her life listening to her aunt’s stories and learning the language of the birds, especially the swans. And when she was older, she watched as a colt was born, and she heard the first word on his tongue, his name, Falada.
Yes, I have hit the bottom now and then, but it always with the knowledge that my father is rich beyond belief, backing me up.
Josin McQuein's PREMEDITATED, about the lengths one girl will go in order to get revenge on the boy who ruined her cousin's life, to Krista Vitola at Delacorte, at auction, for publication in Fall 2013, by Suzie Townsend at Nancy Coffey Literary & Media Representation.
“Trying too hard?” asked Steve.
Your issue bitch is a beached whale Tale
But I gotta keep trying
but it can be rejuvenated
2 pencil
Much love.
-Lil Nette
Attainability: SHACKED UP WITH A MODEL
from Lake Lure Cottage Kitchen
Isn't that kind of racist?
I used to shun black and white but lately I can't get enough of it. The older I get the more muted my wardrobe gets yet I still tend to shock people (in a good way) with the pieces I wear. Like these shiny black leggings. I bought these last season at Target (they're quick on the trends, I tell you) and when I'd wear them to work the president of the company always commented on how I looked like I was going to kick his ass.
Answer 1: This first question should be easy. Only the DoI and BoR are about liberty. I think we can all agree that the concepts in those two documents are essential to a free people. In contrast, the seven articles of Constitutional power delineate the power structure established by, and powers granted to, the central government. The other amendments primarily patch holes in that framework when too much actual liberty threatens to squirt out at the seams.
Even though most items at High Street Market are out of my budget,
It got me thinking about my own choices lately from the canvas of games — something which is certainly divergent from the AAA space. I’ve been continually frustrated lately trying to find something worth playing that can hold my interest on the iPhone for example. All the hardware I could ask for in my hand and yet not a damn thing that seems compelling. I’ve booted up several potential contenders I had high hopes for and yet, nada.
Genealogists and various organizations in Europe and North America have produced maps that make learning about your surnames fun!
Brown, short-sleeved linen jacket, Forever 21. White lace blouse, Newport News. Lime cami, NY & Co. Brown and white skirt, Andre Oliver (thrifted). Daisy brooch, thrifted.
Beer B: St. Bernardus Tripel
7) Bela Lugosi or Gary Oldman?
1. Walking with Awareness, Calm, and Confidence
wolf, chess, or vampire teethe charm!
#24
The Other Side
½ tsp dried basil
The below extract is from the book, and it works very well as a short story (which is how it was published first before being a part of the book). The premise is simple, Mark Renton (or Rents) is our junkie, he’s planning to get off the heroin, but soon decides otherwise. Mike’s the dealer holding. The story gets rather graphic towards the end.
It feels boring. Stale. If I was a stranger reading it, I'd go "Oh for fuck's sake, shut the hell up."
Enter below on the Rafflecopter widget. One lucky reader will win 1 Booty Buns Cloth Diaper and a $30 GC to Red Barn Cloth Diapers to choose your favorite. This would be a great addition to any stash or a great way to get started in cloth. Giveaway ends May 12th, 2012.
We are not at home in the world because we imagined it is as we have become, full of nothing but yearning and forgetting and hoping for something so raw we can’t describe it. We think of the world as the place of beginnings and ends, and we forget the inbetween, and even how to inhabit our own bodies. And then in adulthood, we sit and wonder why we feel so lost.” — Simon Van Booy, Love Begins in Winter
Neem, however like everything it can have side effects and can be deadly to children.
“It should, but you might have to stop and repeat the whole process one more time just to be safe.”
2 cups finely chopped cooked chicken
If you get x77, x88, x99 on the timer, a Orange Augment abode appears, which lets you accretion a Mega Augment into your inventory, appropriately cardinal annihilation in it.Secrets:
As for my brother and his family everyone is fine. Nobody was home at the time so nobody was hurt or anything but the house was destroyed. So they are busy getting back on their feet.
I've actually tried this before and it was heavenly! The only thing I didn't put on it were the artichoke hearts because I spent about 30 minutes in the canned food isle looking at corn, green beans, pinto beans, spaghetti sauce, every can on the isle and completely missed the artichoke hearts. Sneak sneaky. I finally found the artichoke hearts and plan on adding them this week!
Active lines will ensure thаt updates аrе received аnd communication with other online participants іs guaranteed. A keyboard and mouse iѕ recommended. The mouse wіth scroll wheel іѕ recommended fоr alоng wіth the multiple buttons feature.
2 tea
YUWAW Blog (yuwawblog.wordpress.com) is a participant in the Amazon Services LLC and Amazon EU Associates Programmes designed to provide a means for sites to earn advertising fees by advertising and linking to amazon.com, amazon.ca, amazon.co.uk, amazon.de, amazon.fr, amazon.it and amazon.es. Certain content that appears on this website comes from Amazon Services LLC and/or Amazon EU. This content is provided “as is” and is subject to change or removal at any time.
This has to be the cutest idea for a cupcake I have ever seen!! Really!!!
Slaughter houses
She loves the Slinky Malinki series, so I was happy to find this at the library. This one brings out the 'villian' of the original for his own spot in the limelight. He isn't afraid of anything, but himself! I will end up buying it because she'll have it re-read as much as the others.
The Writ of Habeus Mentem is founded on the Writ of Habeus Corpus. Habeus Corpus is an ancient writ, or legal action, by which a prisoner can be released from unlawful detention. The remedy of Habeus Corpus can be sought by the illegaly detained prisoner or by another person coming to his aid.
In the grand scheme of things, plantar fasciitis is hardly the worst thing that could happen to a body of my vintage. It still pisses me off, though. Anything that threatens my ability to take a daily health walk is threatening my ability to stay sane and fight the belly tire.
I can't tell you. I think that is for every individual to decide for themselves. We all have different opinions and different levels of what causes us to be morally outraged.
Remember our sponsor this month is Stamp Insanity and they are giving us 5 digis to give away!! Paper Pretties are also giving us an awesome set to give away!! Don't forget you will get to be the guest designer for Aug if you win as well!!!
Readers of the 1709 Blog may have spotted the nearly simultaneous postings by the IPKat's valued friends John Enser and Ben Challis on the same news item (this sort of thing happens even in the best-ordered blogging teams, since the smell of breaking news to an IP blogger is not unlike that of catnip on a cat). Accordingly the IPKat has bounded over to the back pages of the 1709 Blog and kidnapped the post by John, for the edification of his readers here. Writes John:
Ernest Dowson, Decorations (1899).
“I’m sorry… I’ll take it out…”
But luckily for me it isn’t actually that cut and dry. The science courses are quite varied actually, in that some videos are 5 minutes and some are even 30. Some have 100 lectures, some have only 30 or 50, some even a 120. As for the Math? Most of those courses I actually complete through the ‘practice’ section of the website. If I can figure it out on my own, or only by watching part of the video, I may as well advance. Now obviously the practice questions themselves also add time… Yeah, not exactly simple. But I’ve given myself a rough estimate, and my rough estimate tells me that I need to… Work harder!!! If I really want to do something as amazing as ‘finish’ Khan Academy (at least for my current academic goals) I’m really going to have to push hard this summer and be serious about setting up a schedule and specific expectations for myself. I’ll have to tell my friends and family too so they don’t mess me up or anything.
My design was inspired by a few challenges:
And because of my stupid NEED for someone else to SEE me, because of this – it felt so beautiful… beautiful feeling he created in me I clung. And I feared. And I doubted my worth because I was yet to know it. I didn’t fear as much this last time. I was still nervous, but it was mostly from, LOL, just, at that point realizing I was mad in love with him. There, I fucking said it. Mad in love and wanting so badly for him to love me.
3. The three or four box method WORKS.
I topped it off with a layer of pastry cream, layer of strawberry jelly + fresh strawberries.
25-27 Bureaucrat DRAGON 74
So I asked my other friend how he felt about clever women. “I love them,” he said. “I’m sparked off by clever minds. I like independent women, those I can discuss things with, women who think outside the box.”
Joseph Conrad: “The mind of man is capable of anything, because everything is in it, all the past as well as the future.”
UPDATE WEDNESDAY, SEPTEMBER 21, 2011
the flood of memories I have of special vacations.
it at roadside chaat stalls. Aloo Kabli or aloo
the day we went to Bangor
People tripping over the carpet every four seconds
This is one of those family tradition things that my family never did, and my husband’s family ALWAYS does.
I, Kaitlin, (the little one in fabulous stripes and the drivers seat of the laundry basket below) am bringing my joy and love for design/doodles/crafts/all.things.awesome and combining them with the amazing craft+diy superpowers of my older sister, Kelsey, (my laundry basket passenger and blonde haired creative genius).
Its the end of November already and our last palette before our Christmas Spirit Inspiration begins. You will want to keep your eye out....we will have regular posts on the The Color Room showing you all kinds of Christmas projects our Designers and members have to share! But for this week we will think about this palette....a nice boys palette! Cant wait to see what you can create with these colours!
Whether you’re looking for a hard-to-find item like M&M’s baking bits or just a wide selection of your favorite fruits and nuts, you’ll find it at Nuts.com. You can also count on excellent customer service that will keep you coming back.
As far as performances go, I never expect anything less than the best from The Dirty Pearls. They pour with intensity, it's as if they actually run on "Caffeine and Gasoline" (track 3 on Whether You Like It Or Not, in case you were curious). Marty E., Dougie, Tommy, Sunny and Tommy London ripped through all their staple tracks including "New York City Is a Drug," "Sucker For a Sequel," "Static," "Luvsikluv," "Whether You Like It Or Not," and of course "Who's Coming Back To Who." After many promises from London about the album having no ballads, they relented and threw in "You Got Me Where You Want Me" at the last minute. As a dude who switches off his brain when bands perform ballads, I was enthralled by how cool this track is. I even fired up my Zippo lighter app on the iPhone. At one point soon after Tommy London thanked everyone for being there and mentioned that he read on his Twitter feed that there were people in the crowd who came from as far as Berlin, Germany and even...NEW JERSEY hahaha!!! Those of us from across the river appreciate the shout out!
Deputy Richard Boyd Barrett: ￼ ￼ Many of the points have been made but like other Deputies, I believe the Minister should delete this section. When one looks at the combination of measures in the budget which were directed at lone parents, one would have to conclude that, in a quite malicious way, lone parents were attacked with the deliberate intention of driving them out of the workforce or that these measures were based on complete and utter ignorance of the nature of lone parents and people in receipt of lone parents’ payments.
Besides getting to look at the fabulous clothes and drinking free champagne in Saks, the parents of the Boy & Girl of the Year spoke, and all of the Man & Woman of the Year candidates were announced. Katie of course got the most cheers! When the parents spoke about their journeys with their children and how the Leukemia & Lymphoma Society has helped them, it really tugged at my heart, and I teared up (along with all of the other women in the room). Help Katie help those affected by blood cancer by donating here.
Clearance guys test your knowledge and can sucker you. One famous cheat is to say that they can save you from some accessory charges as they have contacts in customs, and show the tax amount, and tell you how much you need to bribe the customs. Seems in many cases there is no such accessory charge, and the “Bribe” is actually cash they pocket. How can you track this,
"How can a cake made with vegetables and covered in cheese mixed with sugar actually be good?" The only way to answer that question is to give everyone a taste. Or, you could tone it down a bit and pair a carrot cake with another kind of frosting.
"chronic masturbation syndrome and severe sexual discomfort," and that
This weekend I was fortunate to spend time with two incredible groups of friends. After two evenings of celebration, laughter, dancing, a few tears, discussing family old and young, life-changes, film, books, and a rainbow of other topics, I have spent a lot of time thinking about my friendships.
All of these people are preying on one bias all humans have, our tendency to overreact to the latest news. Recent news is more valued than news of the past. In this post I explain.
'They dance close in London, yes, but it's not milonguero' said Enriqueta, and I think I'm beginning to get an idea of what she means. Just dancing close embrace doesn't make it milonguero. Perhaps these videos make that clearer.
In July, I’m looking for a pair of bright jeans (or pants). Urban Outfitters has some options (by BDG) and free shipping this weekend. I may also pick up a few of the Calypso St. Barth for Target pieces that are now on clearance.
These Inspirational accessorized Artifacts bear witness to Re-Possessing the Ever-lasting, Ever-flowing, Sustaining Spirit of the Aesthetic of Funk, and the abilities of this under cultivated aesthetic to enhance daily life of the Super-Natural Nature of Everyday People through the art of crochet.
We are using the Charlotte Mason methods more full time this year. Lots of reading, narration and copywork. Connor really enjoys it. A few months ago he declared he was going to give up reading. A few days ago he exclaimed that he loves reading!
"Shot of Poison" by Lita Ford
Q019) If you won the lottery and won 300 million yen (T/N: about $3.6millionUSD), what would you do?
hope’s cedar chest beat to shit.
Unfortunately, we found the program to be a bit on the clunky side. If you tap the sidebar, you’re given the option to view your media in a timeline, or search through your catalogue, but the experience is slow.
You honor your bigger “Self.” When you understand who you are—as a human, in relation to God or your spiriutality—and when you are able to consider the “other” without compromising or obsessing about “me,” you are setting yourself up to live a healthy, beautiful relationship. (Nothing more………..I couldn’t have said it better.)
2) Talk to the blue dude! (picture 2) He says Beacom is on an island past Thenton Tower, but the only way to get there without a boat is jumping off of the tower! Normally that would kill a person though, so you may want the cloak of wind. Unfortunately... they already gave the cloak to some other guy that hasn't returned. Adviser dude thinks the guy might still be in the tower so if he's there, alive or dead, just take it off him (how lovely). And if you can't do that, then he says he'll try to figure another solution out (but he won't).
It looks like the prom princesses in the above video had a little fun and found the incident to be a drag when they on-sited a vehicle fire while all dollied up for a parade in Padua, MN. The firefighters, who were from the Sedan Fire Dept, did exactly what any firefighter would do, they grabbed a hoseline and put the fire out.
At that point you’re looking at it and saying…”hmmm. on the one hand Newt appears to be a hypocrite, a pragmatic one that will say whatever will gain him power at the time, but a hypocrite nonetheless. Versus Ron Paul, a man who doesn’t see anything wrong with letting Iran having a nuke. ” Iran, a country led by the Ayatollah and Ahmadinejad, two Holocaust deniers who are religious zealots and certifiably insane…because I can’t possibly see anything wrong with that. Any person with half of a functioning brain (clearly not Ron Paul) knows that the people in charge of Iran are so insane they will use a nuclear weapon against the Israel and the U.S. the consequences be damned, because they don’t think there will be consequences, because they think Allah is on their side, and thus they won’t be harmed for carrying out his will. When Paul mentions the Chinese and the Russians as having more nukes, he seems to fail to realize there is difference between just being evil and being evil AND batshit insane! Ron Paul makes Neville Chamberlain look like a genius of foreign policy who plans for the long term outcome of events.
It was cold and rainy today. A good day stay home and mess around in the kitchen. I finally made that apple pie, I kept saying I was going to make but didn't.
Starry night
Emma has been wearing this skirt for a year and shows no sign of stopping. I am thinking of making one for myself, a bit longer of course, perhaps in black. As an example of the versatility of this pattern, and the creativity of my daughter, last week Emma came bounding down the stairs dressed like this:
Gerrard’s Liverpool team-mate Jamie Carragher, who retired from international football for a second time after the 2010 World Cup, added his support for Hodgson.
Other Bible translations read “so that we may know them”. The Hebrew word that is commonly translated as “have intercourse”, or “know” is yada.
“’White House honey.’ That sounds bad," Leno quipped. "You know, with a different president that could mean a whole different thing, ‘a little White House honey.’”
While Emilíana says she hasn’t technically disowned her early albums, don’t expect a reissue any time…well, ever. “They don’t mean anything or say anything about me anymore,” she says. “In my world, I was just in a box, singing, and discovering something mind-blowing. It is what it is, but they are nothing to really hoo-ha about, you know? Afterwards people just wanted me to use that power voice all the time, and I just really wasn’t that into it. It was all so theatrical, total Queen! I should have been a transvestite.”
- Publishers Weekly
I'll be back when this glamourous gig is over.
A human soul must be respected. These people did not respect the human soul. The man was calm and kept his cool. He refused to be blindfolded, and insisted upon facing death with open eyes. They covered their faces, while his face was not covered. He stood solid as a mountain, and said the two parts of the shahada: “I bear witness that there is no god but Allah, and I bear witness that Muhammad is His messenger.” “I bear witness that there is no god but Allah, and I bear witness that Muhammad is His messenger.” He said: “I bear witness that there is no god but Allah,” but they did not let him complete it, and they beheaded him. The man died saying: “There is no god but Allah.” How can anyone curse a man, who says: “There is no god but Allah”? Anybody whose last words are “There is no god but Allah” goes to Paradise.
We reported on July 19 that the NHS paid £32.27 per loaf of non-gluten bread, given on prescription to sufferers of coeliac disease. In fact, the cost per loaf is around £2.82, £32 being for an average prescription of several loaves. We are happy to make this clear.
Dirty Plum is absolutely gorgeous as well. It looks way better on the skin than it does in the pan. Both the blushes are neither muddy or dirty. I was concerned how the satin formula of the blushes would apply as all my other MAC blushes are sheertone shimmers. The finish is between matte and shimmery and it looks really good. They just take a bit more effort to blend but with a soft buffing brush such as the MUFE one, it's no problem at all. I am a total blush whore and have so many blushes but these are unique to my collection. I think they would suit all skintones. Don't be afraid by how dark Dirty Plum looks if your white as snow like me. A good buffing brush and a light hand is all you need...
Lemon Chicken
After a sleepless night punctuated by dreams of school tracksuits and blazers, a vision arose. Cue lots of teasing from parents spotting me sneaking into school with boxes. They may laugh, but when I open the doors to my domain now I am met with tranquil neat labels.
Anyway, back to parents. D'you know what mine said to me? Not just once, but twice (in relation to Doctor Who and Primeval respectively):
Fourth round:
Germany and France doubtless will benefit much from close consideration of what Charlemagne would have thought and reinstatement of the Frankish Empire under Constitutional Monarchy (what else is the Western portion of EU after all??? A spiritual continuation of France, Germany and Spain, being vassal Kings under a Frankish Emperor probably to match and equal what the Commonwealth or whats left of the Commonwealth is . . .).
Get away from the beautiful stranger"
Tell me about The Shaved Pigs? You recorded two albums of hardcore punk in the late 80’s right? Did you see any parallels between the NYC punk and ska scenes?
To the knowing Light of the stable
“How can Pakistan aid and abet invading its neighbor and co-religionist?… How can Pakistan’s clerics remain silent? In my opinion, no Muslim cleric, Arab or otherwise, can in any instance allow a Muslim to support an invasion of his brother’s house in another’s cause.”
Other than the innard shifting, I’ve been having some serious heartburn. I don’t remember having this issue with Anna, but it makes sense since my stomach is behind my boobs now. If I lie down after eating – even a few hours after eating – I pay for it dearly. I haven’t caved and eaten any Tums yet, but now I think it’s time. They’re just so disgusting that I’ve avoided them thus far.
quilters safety pins
Whiles crooning (humming) o'er some auld Scots sonnet;
Me: Oh yeah, what kind?
The How Class Works – 2012 conference schedule, registration, housing, and other information are all up on the Center for Study of Working Class Life Website: http://www.stonybrook.edu/workingclass/conference/2012/
Mr Bull took out a grievance, but the matter was not properly investigated by the council.
a bowl of jello,
2010.09.07 Thailand Narathiwat 2 0 Two middle aged Buddhist teachers, husband and wife, are murdered by Islamic radicals.
Miscellaneous activities... I have my Master Gardener class this evening. Last Thursday I took a tour of a fellow homesteaders garden and hen house land she looked at my greenhouse and seed starting system. I loved her method for growing tomatoes. She ties them in rows to a 6' tall pea trellis. No tomato cages to worry about falling over or to mess with at the end of the season. I may try it. I am also considering vermiculture. Amy of Homestead Revival has a great post about getting started and it even features a tutorial for constructing a worm compost bin with a few rubbermaids HERE. Check it out. I am not sure whether or not I can add this to my repertoire this season, but I hope to. That's it from my garden. What have YOU been up to this week???
Unless I’m very much mistaken, Hulks only non-”grrrr” line:
The washing machine is fixed now that the blocked spigot is unblocked. A simple thing, and the machine lives to wash another day.
With the holidays coming up in just a few days, what else is better than to curl up by a fireplace with a cup of hot chocolate in your hand and reading this wonderful book by Colin? Or if you live in the tropics like I do, you can curl up on your beach blanket! :)
Damn it…..rats the size of house cats. OMG!!!
5) The Back Up
Plus, bonus -- this is also a mystery. Alex was six when his father was killed; and Alex is beginning to ask questions, to try to solve his father's murder.
Sophia did a great job running his butt over the 12,600-foot pass. She helped cue him to eat and drink at regular intervals. She’s good at coaching during long events, even when she’s breathless. During this particular event, she multi-tasked…also taking some time to take in the sights, and to take a few photos. They both rolled into the Twin Lakes aid station at about 6:30 p.m. or so. Sixty miles were behind Greg, with only 40 to go.
Spinach, 1 bunch, cut into small strands
Seeing as how most people either want to or already have visited the Grand Canyon at some point in their lives, I thought I'd share what we did:
Website design is important for marketers to consider, and one area is the usability of the website for the visitors. Before taking the course, I never considered the usability of a website and what separates bad and good websites from excellent websites. The course included a project to test the usability and provide an audit of a website.
Morning peeps hope you are well and looking forward to the weekend of rain....lol, well in the Midlands where I am we are in for another wet day tomorrow roll on May hopefully we'll get some sun then.....talk about April showers.Despite the weather we are selling ice cream at work brrrr.
I had no idea her books literally corresponded to cheap erotic fiction with the variant of well-known rockstars as male protagonists. I indeed found it interesting under some aspects but it generally left me perplexed under many others: for whatever reasons (I blame you Cameron Crowe, you and the fantastic Penny Lane) I thought groupies back in the day were more about the music than having sex with rockstars for social climbing motifs. Apparently I was wrong: everything in Pamela Des Barres’ accounts is focused on how god/how bad the sex was with those people, "the guitarists with fast fingers" and all that stuff including some shallow comments on the “physical qualities” of the rockstars, seriously worthy of any cheap quality female oriented magazine.
Happy Friday!
As we continued the conversation, I began asking questions about John, discovering that he was a teenager. I asked my friend why John wasn’t taking communion and why he wasn’t involved with the confirmation class. He said that his parents said that they didn’t think he was ready for either one. I then asked him whether or not anyone had asked John if he was ready.
Breaking Dawn part 1 also came out last week. Did everyone pick up their copy and watch it 3 times like I did??? heehee
But you see, I have a theory: the 1990s were, and will be forever be remembered as one of the high points of America’s existence. The US is a pretty new country. It doesn’t have many golden ages, but the 50s was one. If we look at a couple of the characters of the fifties: optimism, just finished a war, exporting a lot of our culture, the economy was doing well, our president played the saxophone… I may have to do more research in order to support my point, but the main idea is this: The Berlin came down in 1989. It symbolized the defeat of the Communists. We, the not-Communists, had won.
In a way, this is a good thing. The moulting masses are benefitting from the balmy conditions instead of snuggling down in to the nest boxes and shivering, for example. But it is confusing. My roses have bloomed again. My summer bedding plants are valiantly flowering on, and the girls are firing out the odd egg while looking puzzled. Generally, my pekins shut up shop for the winter come October. I imagine them sitting on their perches at night, using their talons and wing feathers to count up just how many months since their last egg break.
And then they came for the gun owners, And I didn't speak up because I didn't own a gun;
Book Summary: As the sun sets behind the big construction site, all the hardworking trucks get ready to say goodnight. One by one, Crane Truck, Cement Mixer, Dump Truck, Bulldozer, and Excavator finish their work and lie down to rest—so they'll be ready for another day of rough and tough construction play! This book has irresistible artwork and sweet, rhyming text.
The "Sabre and Melissa Siren making love" page from the original Sabre graphic novel, which Don notes was the first American comic sold directly through the comic book stores.
CONNECTION and LOVE
Cigar City Jose Marti
Worsted weight cotton yarn, small amount for each cloth and size US10 (6.0mm) knitting needles
Add the mustard seeds and when they splutter, add the cumin seeds and the asafoetida powder..
Now the same sort of people as me - sportswomen, cleaners, farm labourers, sales assistants, cafe assistants, barmaids, students, writers, journalists, mothers, wives, friends, daughters, sisters, colleagues, and lots of other decent, hard working, loving, generous, people of all races are being discriminated against openly because they will not allow other people's choices not to smoke to be forced upon them.
The cardiologist ran stress tests; they ran blood tests, and every other conceivable test. Final diagnosis – NOTHING. NO ABNORMALITIES DETECTED. No abnormal chemical levels, no traces of heart damage, NOTHING. He is discharged 3 hours after arriving at the hospital. Either I need to go back to study, because after 25 years I have no idea what I am doing, or accept that God is capable of great miracles. Personally, I believe the latter.
My family joined me at some point and we found a secret underground entrance into one part of the building complex, but the competition ended as soon as we found it, and so everyone had to start leaving; but I can not remember what happened next exactly, except that my family & I went home to a house that looked like part of my grandfather’s house from the inside.
“Pretty Woman,” when in reality “girls don’t ever see a penny,” Herzig said.
It’s safe to say that I’m not excited about this future.
Of cabbages - and kings -
"That's a...." I began to say.
For the white sauce
Over the next six days Little Claire be showcasing one of the stamp designs each day and I will post a couple of cards using the design of that day. Tommorrow it will be the turn of 'Sunday Morning'.
Being that I wanted to Make Films during my Twenties, but didn’t get and/or create a chance too… But did pursue it from 1999-2003, it’s True to say that Film Making is truly one of my Greatest Passions…
Let me take a few moments to deny these charges.
The main event was Triple Chocoholic and they're cheating a bit here in trying to get one over on those southern jessies at Wells & Young and their merely Double Chocolate Stout. In fact they're both made with cocoa and chocolate syrup, with Sataire cheekily claiming a chocolate bonus point for the chocolate malt, which Wells & Young also use and which, of course, involves no actual chocolate.
RAID level : 1
I admit that I find some of the celebrities speaking out about this to be somewhat disingenuous and maybe that’s my own cynicism, but it doesn’t mean they’re wrong. They’re, in fact, completely right. The MPAA needs to adjust this. Make the movie unrated. But the fact that they’re saying things like “It’s our job to warn parents…”. It’s bullshit. It’s offensive. For my money, there’s not a single parent out there who should object to their kids seeing this movie.
There are men that share their sperm and there are fathers. I think about that when I get to them.
the people worked together
God abiding nation
The bad reasons!
It is now well after 10 pm and time for a rest. Both dogs are awaiting their final walk of the day with Hubby. Meanwhile, I am going to avail myself of a book to read as I finally get to relax after my early start at 7:30 this morning. Reading is a favourite hobby of mine. What a perfect way to unwind after a busy day!
Crazy were David O. Selznick's The Adventures of Tom Sawyer, Boys
May your holiday season be bright, and filled with love, and joy, my Gentle Bloggers. Thank you for stopping by. I'll see you tomorrow as we go through Day 2 of this lovely Virtual Advent Tour. I can hardly wait to come see what you like or want to talk about, this year! Happy Holidays!
Raquelle: Tell us about a little about your dad’s musical talents as a harpist?
The house on the left in the collage above, 241 Clinton Ave, was built by Pratt in 1890 for his son, Charles Millard Pratt. It is now the residence of Brooklyn's Roman Catholic Bishop Nicholas DiMarzio. The house in the upper right, at 229 Clinton Ave, is the Frederick B. Pratt home, now called the Caroline Ladd Pratt House. The house in the lower right, at 245 Clinton Ave., was the home of George Dupont Pratt, built in 1901. It is now part of Saint Joseph's College.
There is a holder to keep some photos in prior to you creating your layouts, Photo cleaning cloths, Photo tape and a set of 16 Photo mounting sleeves in assorted sizes.
Here are some choice phrases from my meeting with the covering surgeon...
9) SD Texas - 1.99
jack: Searchlight is sort of like a late Beatles album - where the songs are all in their own world but not their own universe. There are a few rocking ones, some ballads and a bunch that I don't really know how to describe. When I listen to it they sound like they make sense next to each other even though they're different. Kind of like a long conversation at a party where the subject changes, people's voices get louder, they get pissed off about something, then they laugh, then it's quiet for a second, then they remember something and change the subject again, etc. Hopefully the album is a person you'd want to run into at a party and not a close talker with bad breath confiding in you for an hour about something you don't want to know while the girl you want to talk to is sitting by herself waiting for you.
If Mr Wilders is convicted or even simply driven to be silent, the West will have lost more than it realises.
it's possible to sit on the beach by the cafes
Cosatu's central executive committee set up a commission last year and decided that salary adjustments were necessary across the board.
"The Mayor wanted everybody out February 12; now we have till the end of the school year," he said.
Chere Mademoiselle Grimaud,
The article concludes if the political class cannot agree on this minor issue, how can we expect them to agree on the major issues of our time including Social Security reform, Medicare reform, national debt resolution, etc.? Very scary stuff.
Magickal Properties: Exorcism, fidelity, love, money, protection. Clover is a masculine plant associated with Mercury and the element of Air.
Even to this day man seeks to show God how he is good, strong and intelligent. How many churches glory in numbers? It is of the flesh to boast in the size of the building, number of baptisms, size of the budget or any other things. 1 Corinthians 1:31warns us as Paul quotes from Jeremiah 9:24, “He that glorieth, let him glory in the Lord.” None of these things will make any difference to God when it comes to judgment. Salvation is of the Lord. The believer’s life is to be of the Lord. Man was created to glorify the Creator.
Mary had a little lamb,
We shall see!
Hoping to have a few sponsors that will provide some giveaways on race day.
I stare at the red wine on the tray. With her heavy treads vibrating the floorboards of lightened gray, my wife strolls this way. Her rolls of flesh carry the sickly odor of three-day-old nachos lathered in fake cheese spray.
So, ok.. I'm in the UK (Bristol), albeit not Scotland, but the UK, so bagpipes are not so far out of the ball park.
The Buncheong exhibit of Korean ceramics at the Asian will be closing January 8th and as it's a free day at the Asian, try to check the exhibit out before it closes.
-he’s going to raise my taxes,
When my husband first brought this boob home to meet his parents, they all had the obligatory “get to know you” conversation. It is important to note that both my husband and the boob were in college at this point, so one could reasonably assume that she was at least remotely ambitious. Anyway, when the conversation turned to what she wanted to do when she grew up, she promptly told my in-laws that she wanted to be a trophy wife.
512.398.9344
When Sarah Palin emerged on the national stage, she was immediately perceived as a threat to the democratic ideal that minorities -women included - are strictly democratic voters. Well, the ones not suffering from Stockholm Syndrome, that is. They managed to bring her down with an overwhelming number of legal challenges to her in her capacity as governor. These bogus suits were costly not just in terms of dollars, but also in terms of the time spent dealing with them instead of the business of the state (which she was then criticized for neglecting). The fact that none of the suits had any merit and cost the Alaskan taxpayer millions means nothing. The ends justified the means.
So today, before the chocolate straight out of the jar thing, I had every single last one of them :)
Hanging on the built in china cabinet. I kept the other wreaths out from November until about March last year... I plan to keep this one out too. It adds a little something to the cabinet and isn't too bold.
And You preserve them all.
sides. I brought along
Nanay and Tatay had sold newspapers and empty bottles to junk shops. Nanay had cleaned comfort rooms for a living while Tatay drove a tricycle. That’s how hard their life was. But they stuck it out together and raised five children who now take turns looking after them.
I seriously don't know what I would have done without Jackie. Saturday after the shower she helped me organize everything into piles. Then she took me to several stores on Sunday to return stuff. I still don't understand how it happens since we had a registry...but we got several duplicates. And if I'm being honest, we got a few gifts that weren't on the registry which I didn't like. (Whoops) By the end of the day on Sunday I had credits at Babies R Us, Target and Walmart. Now I just need to figure out what we need so I can go back and spend my credit. It's burning a hole in my wallet!
He that abideth in the doctrine of Christ, he hath both the Father and the Son. 2 John 1:9 b
When your mommy friend is telling you about a victory they had, even if you don't agree with what they're doing, tell them they're doing a great job.
The other is Snoppy and she is like three times Punkys size and all black. YES they ARE sisters.
“Our Father in heaven, may your name be honored.”
child does have medical or emotional issues
But first I have to practice the stitch to make sure it is starting and ending properly for the measurements of our bench. I'm practicing in two yarns and hook sizes in cream and white. Of course the cover will be full of color when I get around to picking my colors.
Once you logged into rapnet site under account menu you will find the menu to download the listing. Under that menu you can get the download url with various options
“People were scared,” she added. “Many came into the streets, particularly from high-rise buildings. Glass has shattered.” She added that her cousin in a high-rise building along the shore was told to evacuate against a possible tsunami they she was told might hit at 5 p.m. “But so far I don’t think there’s too much property damage,” she said.
Oh and another thing me fridge freezer has started to hum a different tune, it might be because it is feeling left out, the dryer got attention when that broke, the cooker got a check up and the washer has had some TLC, so I figure that the freezer is just making itself heard, well I have news for you Mr fridge freezer if you pack in I will never speak to you again OK, you got that, good, so stop this stupid loud humming this minute!
-the ability to learn her new camera so she can photograph said event
Céline: You know, it’s so weird…that people think they are the only one going through tough times. I mean when I read the article I thought…your life was perfect. A wife, a kid, a published author. (Jesse laughs.) Your personal life is more of a mess than mine! I’m sorry! (Both laugh.)
in the waggoner's mouth
This longing for lost innocence is a thread running through
Brooklyn's spaceship
mortal
Okay, okay, I have been a horrible person.
And don’t forget that if you’re bringing the kids, there’ll be plenty for them to do at Kids Create. All Things Kids is sponsoring a contest and this year’s theme is “Spinning”.
1 package sushi nori or Korean Nori
Once everything is smooth and melted, let it cool for about 10 minutes and then add the marshmallows and pour it into a dish. Put it in the freezer for 1 hour to set, cut and serve (and devour!). Enjoy!
Nature does not forgive and epitomizes the fact that might is right and that the weak perish and disappear. Strength to survive is what nature understands and without being able to protect oneself then we are left vulnerable to those who are determined to take what is ours by force or by subterfuge. In the case of Britain the population has become so brainwashed by those seeking our downfall that we allow stupidity to govern our daily actions rather than to oppose these laws and fight to take back what was once a great and prosperous country.
Water was available on tap or in jugs at the food bar, with some soft drinks at reasonable prices. All loos were roomy and in very good condition.
As I understand it, according to Russell T Davies, the Ood come from the same general area of the universe as the Sensorites, and as such are related. Even their planets of origin have similar names: The Ood-Sphere and The Sense-Sphere. This is a terribly clever way, I think, of taking a faulty idea from the classic series and finding ways to make it work in the new show, without ever using words like remake, reenvision, or reimagine. Saying that the two species are related does two things: It provides due reverence for the original idea, and it adds a nice layer of continuity for long term fans. These days Moffat gets all the credit for being the clever one, but let’s not forget that mad Uncle Russell wasn’t missing any crayons from his box of colors, either.
What I say is “Fuck you!” to them and their tribes of tracksuit-wearing thieves. Pay them zero. Get your lazy arse to work. Whore yourself if you need to.
She added that the current 50-metre exclusion zone from the polling centres has now been extended to 100 metres or any distance that the EC may deem fit.
I got to talk shortly with Žižek. He asked me "where are you from?" I said "Kuwait," and he started telling me about his visit to Dubai and how he got a Pakistani taxi driver to take him to the poor neighborhoods where migrant workers lived in bad conditions. He also told me that the first Arabic translation of one of his essays appeared in one of Kuwait University publications.
I think that "Garbage" now weighs 70lbs with the mass of white maple anchored to the outside of it. "Tumult" is framed with some lovely Pacific Coast Cypress, which has a nostalgic yet suprisingly acidic odor.
And every hand-free minute counts, let me tell you. This guy loves to nurse.
Keep Reading,
I read far too much of it yesterday for someone who had to get up at 5 am for the first day of going out in the field for Ornithology.
The recent calls for a boycott of traditional, closed-access scientific publishers – especially the Fred Goodwin-esque pariah-of-the-moment, Elsevier – have caused much discussion over the last week in the vision science community. Elsevier publishes the long-running flagship journal Vision Research and many of my fellow researchers are expressing frustration at providing free content and peer-review services to a journal whose owner makes money by restricting access to research, rather than disseminating it. Suggestions made in the past few days have ranged from black-and-white suggestions that we simply boycott all non-open journals, to boycotts of specific publishers, to more subtle discussions of the role of copyright in this battle, a battle which is widely being perceived as a tipping point in the open access revolution.
but still you never would believe it
Every time she gets on that bus I can't help but think back to when she was Nora's age. Sniff Sniff. And now my baby is riding the bus. At least this year, anyway.
Delaware paid an extra price for its multiyear effort to redevelop Wilmingtons Christina River waterfront. In addition to clearing away old structures and building new streets and utilities, the worst of the citys environmental legacies had to be removed, cleaned up or sealed over.
I have many yummy meals planned and will keep the blog updated with photos of our mini vacation which will start tomorrow at around 2 or 3. We plan to get to Des Moines Friday and then put a good day in Saturday with a Sunday noon check in at Boyd Lake Campground, Colorado.
At the show, we had an enter to win drawing for a frame or mirror. We are also offering the same contest to our facebook friends so if you haven't "liked" us on facebook, please do so for a chance to win!
CicLAvia is just days away!! Last week we posted information about making sure your bike is in good working condition before the big day. Now we want to give you some simple tips to ensure everyone who rides a bike at CicLAvia has a blast while riding safely.
“After feeling awful that a music town with such a history would rather have a dance DJ than live music, I thought, ‘What the hell. I got lemons. Let’s make lemonade,’” Watson writes in the CD liner notes.
Hillary Clinton's assertion that "we saw the free and fair election of
“Four pianos”
3/4 cup walnuts, roughly chopped
The three horsemen of the apocalypse, War, Famine and Pestilence, are brilliant characters. War is big and gruff, Famine can’t stop eating, and Pestilence is wracked with diseases and all manner of ailments. Their personalities are so unique and distinct, each funny in their own way. By the end I adored all of them, even Famine who at first I was a little sceptical of.
In our report Shining a Light on the Valley of Heart’s Delight we found that only 3 percent of locations in lower-income areas (which are predominantly communities of color) had dairy alternatives in comparison to 23 percent in the higher income areas.
Wow, its hard to believe that it's already the 15th day of 2012. Time certainly does fly. Anyhow, I finally have some free time to reconnect with my poor, dear neglected blog. I am surprised to see that I still have followers here!!! Thanks for sticking around. So, you may be wondering what I have been up to lately. Pictures speak louder than words, so this pic should explain why I haven't had much time to blog lately.
These are some of my besty friends. That's me on the left with the big schnoz and the target on my boobs.
A. Well, there was no digital newsroom in the mid-1980s. And I have many fond memories of the j-school from my time as an undergraduate. Jim Schumaker, covering town zoning board meetings for Dr. Donald Shaw’s class. I was in Jan Yopp’s news editing class the morning that Challenger exploded on liftoff. The teletype machines were going crazy in the next room.
iKeepSafe has an awesome curriculum to help teach digital citizenship. You can find videos, lesson plans, & more. Faux Paw, the Techno Cat stars in videos that teach children about internet safety, gaming, music piracy, and cyberbullying. My students always enjoy the videos and activities and they lead to really good discussions.
The warp drive won the race, and I hit the next gate and jumped through. It was, however, pretty clear where I was headed. I started the warp to the next jump gate as soon as I could. And, sure enough, the whole gang jumped through to me and broke cloak all around again. This time only one of their ships started targeting me before I was in warp.
Buying A Stylish Replica Watch Online
I hear screams. Someone’s in pain. I run, hoping to get there in time. She’s dying. She’s covered in blood. The poor thing. I pick her up and bring her back to the palace. My clothes are covered. She’s filthy. “Live!” I say to her in her blood. I don’t want her to die. I wash her in warm water and cover her in satin clothes. I hope she survives. She’s crying. The tears are warm on my fingers. Where did she come from?
I met two other guys, one was Justin and I didn't ask the other man's name, but he was a bike builder from Muscatine, Iowa. Justin was up from Phoenix. He kept me laughing. He showed me his bike that had been recently used for an ad for Sucker Punch Sally.
This result is difficult to distinguish from the model that Schmitt prescribed.
"Blessed is the man You discipline, O LORD,
“Our services include editing, proofreading, design, page layout, preparation of print-ready files and delivery of your finished books. Marketing support is available for books which have been professionally edited – that means by someone who earns their living editing books!”
original works for sale including Tony Peters, the up and coming painter Robin Mcgeough,
The derivative phrases “country fried” and “chicken fried” often refer to other foods prepared in the manner of fried chicken. Usually, this means a boneless, tenderized piece of meat that has been floured or battered and cooked in any of the methods described above or simply chicken which is cooked outdoors. Chicken fried steak and “country fried” boneless chicken breast are two common examples.
I hate waiting. I’m terrible at it, which is one reason why I think God puts me into situations where I have to wait so much of the time. I guess He figures that one of these days I’m going to learn it.
BD's Mongolian grill was around the corner and I settled in for a few beers and some grub. I like these type of restaurants. I can get fresh chicken and vegetables cooked to order and relax for awhile. It's a great way to wind down the day. I'm heading off to the motel to crash, and the streets are packed with people. Restaurants are full and I can barely walk across the street from all the traffic. This is obviously the place to be on Friday night. However, I needed sleep and not entertainment.
Carmel Pecan
So I have started the process of:
multiple births
When I started going through the potatoes, I realized that many of the sprouts were coming from the smaller potatoes. There were a few larger potatoes sprouting, but not as many. I did not want to lose these wonderful potatoes, so something had to be done. We're flying through them, but couldn't eat them quite fast enough.
Now, here's my question for you. (the +1 question)
Original Air Date: Jul 5, 2011
Well, tonight was the night. Our last time together as a family. We gathered, we ate, we graduated. We laughed, we loved, we hugged, we cried. I can not believe that I have only known these people for less than 6 months. It seems like a lifetime. They know me more than I know myself, it seems. They have seen me in the best of times, they have seen me in my worst. They watched me struggle, they prayed for me, they watched me fall in love with Jesus. They blessed me, loved on me, encouraged me. They love me and I love them. We are a family, that is what we do. Seeing everybody graduate tonight was amazing and beautiful. We came to Kona as strangers, and are leaving as a family. I have brothers and sisters all over the world, who I can call on at anytime. Doing a DTS here in Kona was the best decision of my life.
First IFP entry from The Rhythm of Kitchen, thank youuuuu ^^. Gulai is one of the popular and widely distributed dish in Indonesian archipelago, especially in Sumatra and Java. The dish was originated from Sumatra, and tought to be the local adaptation of Indian curry, developed and derived from Indian cuisine influence on Indonesian cuisine. The thick and yellowish gulai sauce is one of the most common sauce in Minangkabau cuisine to gave rich and spicy taste for meats, fishes or vegetables. The gulai sauce found in Minangkabau, Aceh, and Malay cuisine is usually have thick consistency, while the gulai in Java is thinner served in soup-like dish contains pieces of mutton, beef or offal. Gulai usually served with steamed rice, however some recipe such as goat or mutton gulai might be served with roti canai. For her first entry, Mbak Elsa came across with Padang food Gulai Otak (brain curry), an offal dish from Minangkabau, West Sumatra, Indonesia. Yes, from the name, it sounds scary hehehe. But, I think its “safe” if we don’t consume it everyday LOL, since it’s good ;p. It’s a quite popular menu; when I go eating in Padang restaurant, I see many love to have this dish on their menu.
6x6 Paper Pads $1.00 each
she kisses with the flat of her nose
If you are a parent and you spend any time in public, you have probably been on the receiving end of some unsolicited advice. I have run into two general types so far:
…And more. Just in drag and drop From All my cd.
I suppose that when it all comes down to it, I’m like this massive shattered jigsaw?!
Now, things are different. The introduction of cell phones allowed people to communicate wherever and whenever. Now, with smartphones, people can update their social networks or send a text with the simple swipe of a finger or touch of a button. Some people like to do these things a lot, including while they are driving, which is why 2012 might be the year that we see a nationwide ban on the use of cellphones, as well as hands free devices,while behind the wheel. Deborah Hersman, the chairman of the National Transportation Safety Board, said that “No call, no text, no update is worth a human life.” and she is right. Why risk the lives of yourself or others? You can wait to say “Lol cool” back to your friend, you can finish the call before you get on the road, and Facebook isn’t going anywhere.
Ten years. Not a single story, poem, script, nothing. Not even a diary entry. (Although there were a lot of lists.) But after ten years it'd had enough of being locked away in my brain, and soon my fingers itched to pick it up again.
The Christadelphians are going to have to rethink their "chosen ones" title
“This is a chunk of land that is right in the heart of the state’s capital and certainly the state is going to have say in what happens when that land completely leaves the state’s jurisdiction,” said Fletcher.
30. The drinking game: Rock, Paper, Scissors......VODKA SHOT.....should alone never be playded aloney.
I then decided to add the gas station from Popup Neighborhood. I cut it at 4.375 x 2.625. For the sign I decided to print Get Well Gas and of course it is free. I then added the cloud from Cricut Craftroom Basics, cut at 1.833 x 1.208. And then Vroom Vroom is cut from Cupcake Wrappers. If you have this cart, you really want to look at the toppers as there are some awesome designs. I cut the shadow in yellow and then cut the flame part off of blue layer. These are cut at 1.292 x .375 and 1.083 x .319.
This path was roughly paved with concrete which I thought would make the ride uphill easier but the tyres were still clogged up with sticky mud and they slipped all over the wet concrete. But when I did find traction, the gear ratio way too high for that sort of incline. After struggling up the first hundred feet I came across a large fallen branch, so after I lifted the bike over the branch and pushed it until I found the slope more forgiving.
On the corner of Rue du Mirail and Rue Saint-François, a stone’s throw from the busy thoroughfare that is Cours Victor Hugo, sits one of the city’s most curious buildings: Hôtel Saint-François*.
And it's Anthony Newley we look to today for his outrageously awful reading of the George Harrison classic Within You, Without You. The whole programme sucks, especially the two dreadful Beatles' medleys performed by the majority of the cast, but Newley (ex-husband of Joan Collins) really should have known better. No stranger to the pop charts, Newley had enjoyed a successful career as a vocalist, beginning in 1959 with the UK top 5 I've Waited So Long, followed by a sting of hits including Personality, Why (originally a 1959 U.S. hit for Frankie Avalon) and Do You Mind, written by Lionel Bart. He even won a Grammy in 1963 for the self-penned What Kind of Fool Am I, wrote the lyrics to Goldfinger, the Nina Simone classic Feeling Good and wrote or co-wrote a shed load of musicals, including Stop the World - I Want to Get Off and Willy Wonka and the Chocolate Factory, nominated for an Oscar for Best Musical Score.
He acknowledged that he and Foster are at odds with one another... to say the least.
And though I weep because those sails are tattered,
Caught it? Jules says it exactly at 1:00 but Jimmy overrides him with a dismissive “No, no, no…”. See it?
Hence, whereas the resale of a downloaded copy by the first acquirer falls within the ambit of the right of distribution and may be carried out without the consent of the supplier under the principle of exhaustion, the assignment of a user licence, independently of the downloaded copy, allowing the program to be reproduced by creating a new copy by download from the internet, does not fall within the scope of the exhaustion principle.
There’s only one man left running for President who understands that. It took me much longer to come to that conclusion than it should have. If you’re on the edge, get off it. It’s an exhilarating discovery to realize Ron Paul has been there all along. Take the plunge.
but how can you change
(p.s. Without my knowledge Saige made an old picture of Mr. Doodles the screensaver on our computer. Now everytime I logged on I am eye to eye with his beady little stare. Creepy guinea pig zombie!)
Growing up Catholic, every week at mass you would receive the elements of Communion. There is something mystical, special and heartfelt about that moment of remembrance of not only Christ’s sacrifice for us but also that He is alive in us through the Holy Spirit.
And tongues to be, your being shall rehearse,
8. Peter Finger - Watchtower
These are warning signs that you may becoming emotionally draining to others. Ask yourself what is motivating you to engage is these draining behaviors and move forward to make positive changes.
Cheer for your favorite Peep. Or cheer for the one that gets the fattest first. Though be warned, the victor is not always the Peep who impales the other first. Often one Peep swells up so big it impales itself on its opponent's lance.
Copics: V20, C3
Before you finish tying your thread into a bow or a knot this is when you can add a further embellishment of a button or a charm or whatever else you have in your stash.
This month's challenge is fussy cutting! Yep, cutting out some of those little details found in the graphics of the papers. This allows you to create some dimension and texture by inking the edges....with none other than the fabulous Quick Quotes PowderPuff Chalking Inks, using pop dots to raise the cutting on the layout and layering the cut outs over other items including the photo.
Why would we take our commitments to this group so seriously? I can only speak for myself when I say that these gatherings have made me a better human being. The more I participate in our group meetings, the more I learn about myself and the more I can understand just a little of what others see as they practice in their spiritual traditions. I find the many ways that we are alike and the few ways in which we see the world differently. I do my best to set aside judgment while noticing that these friends are doing the same for me.
Pamodzi, however, says it was never approached to repay the money early, but had done so — after the Land Bank raised the red flag — because it had obtained cheaper finance elsewhere.
He had been suffering for months from dizziness and perpetual tiredness that doctors were convinced was due to his enormous girth.
This Diamond Ring was written by Al Kooper with a soul arrangement in mind. The song was offered to the Drifters, but they turned it down. Producer George Butcher had a singer and limbo dancer from Miami named Sammy Ambrose record the song first.
Paper: Pool Party, Whisper White, Pattern DSP
Exactly what genetic and developmental changes are required to turn a species from a solitary one into a social one are still unknown, but it seems linked to prolonged maternal rearing, high female:male sex ratios, inbreeding (which promotes selfish altruism through increased kin selection). Studies of mitochondrial DNA (again passed only from the mother), indicate that colonies share a common matriarchal line and suggest that there may be inter-colony competition.
Which brings me to awesome point #2: 20 miles on the bike trainer, middle 10 HARD
76. Chen has a strong vocal and it’s quite high.
Rory has been home from his French exchange trip for a couple of weeks now and it dawned on me that I hadn't told you all how he'd got on. Time to put that right.
In December 2011, Vietnamese Prime Minister Nguyen Tan Dung visited Myanmar to attend the 4th Summit of the Greater Mekong Subregion (GMS) held in Nay Phi Taw.
So as years have passed I have found many other people who share my passion for Biscoff. I also heard that Biscoff spread even exists! Amazing! I’ve been dying to make something inspired by and/or using the cookies or spread since they’re pretty easily acquired in our stores. Every year I spend months planning the surprise birthday cake for my best pal Laura. She always lets me come up with whatever I think is good. By the day of baking, I’d finally figured out my own cake invention that I felt covered a variety of Biscoff recipes and was cohesive while not being overwhelming.
3. Task Snacking
I would say the whole procedure lasted less than 20 minutes total for both eyes. The video (which, unfortunately, has a piece cut out in the beginning) lasted all of 11 minutes, 55 seconds. It was painless and the doctor and his assistants made it that much better.
For me, nothing makes a drama more enjoyable than instantly falling in love with the couple. I can’t say this has happened yet especially as I’m not-so-secretly hoping that she falls for the younger brother. But I’m not a stubborn viewer and will gladly switch ships once I find them compelling enough. So here’s to hoping Ah Jung and Ki Joon soon show me why they should be together.
This bloke gives me a cigarette; I light it quickly and drag on it. Now, I've being through quite a lot over the past few months, you should know?! So whatever this, wherever I am.........well I can't be that startled can I?
All of these people must not only accept their part of the blame for what is now unfolding but it must be pointed out to the people of England that it is not the English nationalist movement that stinks just a few score people.
So yeah, thinking of having a family in Singapore? Earning more money to cover living expenses isn’t enough. Unless you’re going to be like those parents who simply give their kids money and let them do whatever they want without caring for their emotional needs, you’ll probably need to find some other way to have a proper family where you can actually have sufficient time to bond with your kid.
“Cookies, formerly known as fingers” - Schools are infamous for re-naming, all in the interest of better education of course. Students are not allowed to count on their fingers. However, counting dots called “cookies” is not only acceptable it’s encouraged. WISH I were lying.
At the end of the day, you have to want it. I know a lot of people who are in love with the idea of being a writer; they just don’t want to put in the time and effort to actually write. Still working on that manuscript you started 2 years ago? Well, you might want to rethink that.
Romeo Dallaire Omar Khadr
and decided it needed eyelashes and eyebrows. Then he studied
So here are the things that we all need to catch up on.
Somewhere around 4 or 5 months into our time in El Salvador the Lord was now walking me through more trials. I won’t go into the details on this one, because they’re a bit personal, but suffice it to say, if I hadn’t had a kingdom perspective, I’d probably be in a very bad situation. But as these things were thrown at me, and while the devil is trying to poke around at still sore wounds, I made it through and was rewarded with another truth that is THE defining characteristic of me being a Christian.
We had such a fantastic service at church on Sunday. Our worship team was just superb. We did something really different for one part of the service today.
Hose A) Hose B) Way Hose C) Way
I had begun to see it months ago, Jack was getting more and more aggressive, he was disappearing more and more into himself and was letting the monster come out to play. There was nothing I could do about it and all my instincts had told me to run but I didn’t. I stayed with Jack because he had become a part of me, no matter how much I fear him, and I had thought I would never survive out there on my own. That was until Jamie showed up again, gave me back a little bit of confidence.
All part of a delusion.
K's videos for Nutty Wonder Bread were used as examples on the blog by
Do you LOVE tea...like me? I've sort of become a tea fiend in the last couple of years... I'm not shy about my tea addiction either... come and look in my pantry anytime... and you will see no less than 100 different types, flavors and kinds of teas...
- ebooks
Pirate – I have come pretty close to selling everything, buying a boat and taking my horse, my kitties and my fiance out onto open waters. We would be nice pirates, though! When we sneak onto your ship, we will leave something nice instead of taking it… how does that sound? Still not good, huh? Creepy? Yeah. I guess you are right.
The season one finale of Revenge has yet to air, but creator Mike Kelley is already working on the season two premiere, Wetpaint reports.
Wednesday we went out to Henderson's Bistro (up the Dale), not for meal, but because Karen has just sold one of her photographs there - a really nice one of Aysgarth Falls when it froze a while back. Tuesday evening I popped in to see my step-son and wish him a happy birthday. Unlike us, he has an open fire, so I sat down and found it hard to get up again...
And other accounts
ALSO – Remember ‘That Guy King’ is out TOMORROW!!!
Placebo Taste in men UK
So, I looked at the red and white checked border and decided that was the pattern for one of the papers. I used the "Bee a Blessing" in the center to create some word art. I used the words around the edge in various ways...on a ribbon, on a heart. I used the honeycomb pull toy in the print to create a similar one. I really wanted to tackle the other characters in the center, but lost steam towards the end of my kit. Especially since I ended up with "extra" elements anyway.
i love to work out, but i have a problem. I procrastinate.
Looking at the geographical locations, the place is located about 1600 meters above the sea level. The extensive tea plantations surrounding the mountains, the picture book towns, trekking facilities and the winding lanes of this place attracts large number of tourists not only from India but also from other parts of the world. The place is famous for its tea plantations and it is especially known as the tea town of the state.
remember you have loved one's you have close one's who are only one call away .. everything will be fine..
I’ve spent the last few days feeling having a pity party and I think I’ve come up with a pretty fun solution:
In many ways, I see writing voice to be very similar to artistic style. If you hang around art sites like deviantART long enough, no doubt you will run into half a dozen artists in a day claiming the critique is wrong because oversized hands or noses or whatever are part of their “style”, when in reality, they just don’t want to admit they need to practice more. Hell, I’ve used the same excuse to explain why I didn’t need to take a human anatomy class to fix my anime-inspired art back in high school! It’s often a sign of insecurity and inexperience, or it’s a sign of stagnation and comfort, first of which ought to probably get fixed fast, the second of which is okay, but in moderation.
Needle and Coordinating Thread
The number of housing markets showing measurable improvement expanded by 29 metros in February to include a total of 98 markets listed on the Improving Markets Index published monthly by First American and the National Association of Home Builders (NAHB). Thirty-six states are now represented by at least one market on the list.
I paid a visit to the new Natural History Museum of Utah today.
You won’t be disappointed. Perhaps amused, maybe shocked, but you’ll always find something different. Tell your friends – watch them read, and laugh as their heads explode. Yes, it is
According to the publishers, Oxford University Press (OUP),
Happy Tuesday
~finally got my act together and tried out some craft fairs (yes i'm rethinking all that i did this year for next, it was overwhelming this year)
Here is a quick card that I made for the family!
October 18th, 2011
When Pete Marley looks at submissions, he views them from the eyes of a child. Is it easy to understand? Is it accessible enough? There should be a story arc, and a strong ending. He loves to see a type symmetry in the story, e.g. when the beginning and the end happen in the same place (it would be like the story has come round full circle). The text does not have to rhyme - in fact, it is more difficult to sell it internationally if it rhymes.
My house. A nurse calls me. Mom’s in the hospital. She’s tried to kill herself. I go. She’s in the psych ward. She’s lethargic, but I think she realizes she did a very stupid thing. My husband comes. Like he always does, he tries to make her laugh, asking her why she did such a stupid thing. She knows she did a stupid thing. She’ll get better now, right?
50 has so much promise! Can't wait to see what 51 and beyond brings...
Denis Leary ... DIEGO
10:35 - Maryeta Ables Civil society and prohibition
I lived in Hammersmith in west London, the wedding was in Hertfordshire, north of London. Thinking about it now, the sensible thing would have been to go and stay with my parents (also Hertfordshire) and get ready there. But my brain didn't work like that. Instead I arranged to drive right across London, west to east, to Laura's parents' house in Woodford. We'd get ready together, then drive to the wedding.
5: The Mirror.
is there something that would be good, carried to excess? Be pleased to
23 Founders Red's Rye (6.6%)
With your healing power,
He dumped the bodies in a shallow grave. He was captured and quickly confessed. The bodies were recovered. A funeral was held for two twenty-something kids who had had their whole lives ahead of them. Years later, a picture of J’s headstone would be found by ME, on the internet.
2) The members and leaders can be arrested for terrorism under the revised Terrorist Act as they are undertaking 'terrorism' for a political motive
Other than making it smaller and the shorts shorter, the only real change I did was create box pleats. The pattern uses just fold pleats toward the center front, but I chose to sew the pleat, then press it flat from the back to create the open box pleats. With the top and hem pleats, it makes the shorts have the diamond shaped opening.
All of that said...
Of course, this is just a partial list of ingredients you may find helpful to have on hand while exploring a raw food diet. This post was created at the suggestion of fellow raw food blogger D2Quilter, from a comment on My Mostly Raw Pantry post:)
Do you think you can tell..."
head, and just when I was about to throw in the
A similer compilation was published by Great American Audio, whose 1960′s collection includes audio artifacts from kids ‘finding themselves’ in the Hare Krsnas.
It was time to gain control back for my freeze baby fingers. No more endless minutes of searching...
We were seduced and betrayed. I’m not sure whether to blame Comcast, the concept of technology monogamy, or both. I’m still wondering what I did wrong; did Comcast betray the others too?
By age six, she was watching George A. Romero’s zombie classic Night of the Living Dead, so her chosen genre of writing should come as no surprise.
I love the spring weather so far! As we enter May I am excited that the lessons focus on sharing our faith with others! Just about all of us can think of a time when someone shared their faith story. This is why I titled this Yak Pak “Spring into Action!”, because we are free to love others. It is not something we feel we must do, but it is a product of our lives that are filled with the Holy Spirit. What a great theme to share with your kids this month! Enjoy the weather and enjoy being the major spiritual influence of your kids lives!
Absolutely not. Because what we do in between the first and the last, those things matter. No matter who you are, you are touching another. You are impacting a life. Some for the good. Some, not. Some with a greater impact. Others, not. Some with lifelong impact. Others, not. But regardless, your mere existence makes a ripple.
Unschoolers self-select what's important to them and what's not. But HOW? you say. Here's how. They're able to self-select meaningfully because unschooling parents expose the universe (as much of it as they can) to their children in as broad and inviting a smorgasbord as possible. We call this strewing. In a sense, it's the unschooling equivalent to curriculum; but rather than being dictated to the student, it is simply introducing things to the student for their selection or rejection.
Today is one of those days that is just unusual, with it being 11-11-11 and all. I don't' get caught up with numbers or dates. However, it does get me to thinking of how many important dates in my life are shared with other memorable or celebrated dates.
Judge Dismisses Happy Meal Lawsuit
I don’t rant about my kids often, I am, after all, as a parenting journalist considered to be somewhat of an authority on the subject HOWEVER, I am also, after all, very HUMAN. Consider this a rant.
My "R"letter today is for running.
“For that reason, to avoid provoking protests inside and outside the country, it was decided that those people disappear. Each disappearance can certainly be understood as the cover-up of a death.”
EXTENDING the lesson, I plan to make sure each student has an organizer for each: Toot and Puddle. Their job will be to analyze the similarities and differences between the two pig characters.
We did not know each other in a dramatic way like those seen in movies or romance novels but the way we met was special and unique in its own way. I was staring at how the droplets of water magically disappear upon hitting the floor and leaving the floor wet when I saw him. He was walking slowly to his third period class as I watched him.
Therefore I need the following info :
Love is over the times with you
I may well be wrong, but the impression from here is:
“Subject: Letter from Procter & Gamble Exec to Obama
After removing the TP roll inside, I used goof off to get all the adhesive off the containers left by manufacturers stickers, and then washed them with warm soapy water. They seem clean and kosher to me, but since I already have food stored in my Dollorama containers, these will not be used for food. The dog cupboard has been a thorn in my side for sometime, and despite organizing all the treat packages into a basket, we still couldn't manage to keep the treats looking organized. This distaster of a cupboard was the perfect candidate for a JA overhaul!
Stay crafty my friends!
2004 Cave-Aged Ommegang Abbey Ale
How cute is that?
Pepper spray cop, pepper spray cop, you are a meme!
* 1 teaspoon ground coriander
About the bread: It’s easier to get good cupcakes in San Diego than good bread. Fortunately, we have Bread & Cie, a bakery that consistently puts out the sorts of high-quality breads I knew in the Midwest, on the East coast, and in Europe. Go for something with some character, a tight crumb, and a crisp crust. By all means, use flavored breads if you want to experiment; just keep in mind the effect that things like olives, rosemary, or jalapenos may have on the final dish.
It was still tied two innings later when Mark Belanger hit a two-out single and Cuellar followed with a two-run home run of his own! It was part of a career-high three-hit day for the Cuban screwballer, and one of eight career longballs (including his grand slam in the 1970 ALCS). He wasn't exactly Don Newcombe with the bat, as his career slash line of .115/.128/.171, good for a -15 OPS+, illustrates. Anyway, Mike gave back a run in the bottom of the fourth, as Bill Freehan tripled and scored on a Don Wert sac fly. 4-3, O's.
we're completely refurbishing our 7bbl fermentation room and when the ceiling was torn out we found this bottle (and yes, it's full) ... the bottling date is 1994! Sort of a brewery time capsule I guess! A perusal of the original brewing logs (yes, they're still there) provided the original recipe, but not the full story:
To see what the other Challenge Team members have come p with make sure you'll check out
Apparently men may be on to something when they suggest that sex relieves headaches.
When I think about what really makes me happy, what I really crave, I come up with a very different list: concentrated, purposeful work, especially creative work; being with people I love; feeling like I’m part of something larger. Meaning, connectedness, doing strenuously what you do well: not sights, not thrills, and not even pleasures, as welcome as they are. Not passivity, not letting the world come in and tickle you, but creativity, curiosity, altruism, engagement, craft. Raising children, or teaching students, or hanging out with friends. Playing music, not listening to it. Making things, or making them happen. Thinking hard and feeling deeply.
In the following, St. Francis de Sales and Padre Quadrupani put temptations into perspective.
To reduce your risk of developing brain ills such as dementia and Alzheimer’s disease, reduce your weight. That recommendation comes from a series of papers published in the Neurology journal.
Sorry about the blog neglect but it's just like that country western song by Doug Stone says...
According to the video I watched, weighing the flour is more important the relying on a measuring cup. I needed 11-1/4 ounces of flour (or 2 1/4 cups). As it turns out, they measured the same. Still, I do use my digital scale often.
When the company failed to repay the loan, Hammer and Haile sued.
P.S. I was going to suggest a small weekend art market in the West End next year, but with fees like that I won’t bother.
In case you are wondering, Jenkie enjoyed swinging too... even if he had to ride in the pink seat.
Through the help of our agency we connected. We have been blessed to not only be able to keep these two little girls in touch but to become friends with her parents and her brother.
Preheat oven to 350 degrees and line muffin pan with paper liners (recipe yields about 22 cupcakes).
Double miles are valid on tickets purchased between March 26, 2012 – September 30, 2012 for travel June 7, 2012 – September 30, 2012. The bad thing: No Irish whiskey for you during Spring Break. That black and tan is going to have to wait until summer. The good thing: there is no limit to the number of double miles you can earn.
7. I can't believe I have a four year old daughter and a four month old baby...
I usually can tat a rosary in 2 hours, with no problems.
Use the Sony digital assessments and other information that is readily available on the Internet before taking a decision.
Union workers, watching other job sites in Brooklyn and New York operated by non-union labor, have a legitimate sense of grievance; Forest City Ratner’s pledge to use unions--though not necessarily in its pre-construction demolition phase--has earned it continuing support.
What else is left, though, what remains in our genuine smile at the cub, is the nervous realization that there have been other moments in the history of capital in which one passed quickly from smirking afar at the goings-on to becoming that desperate subject struggling to go on or get by. (Therein the utter importance of a certain trajectory of horror literature in relation to thinking the history of human misery: not because it depicts things bestial or debased, retrograde or inhuman, infernal or machinic, but because - and think here of Cornell Woolrich's Nightmare Alley and its mouth full of hot chicken blood or Ballard's tales of those who are dimly aware, like the psychiatrist who has been reduced to a doddering imbecilic pseudo-father by the woman he tried to "cure" - of having once been the one who laughed at those in such a condition. Because those tied to and broken on fortune's wheel remember damn well what it was like to look at the poor bastards mangled below.)
Sold on the line that the new Australian film Wish You Were Here was this year's Animal Kingdom, we went along to the cinema to see it on Saturday night. While neither film presents a flattering picture of contemporary Australians, Wish You Were Here, disappointingly, was never in Animal Kingdom's league.
914 ***D-XI/7/1985. “Article I, Sections 9 and 10 of the Constitution of 1787.” Gannett Lecture Series, Rochester Institute of Technology, Rochester, New York. (Incorporated in Item C-1986(6), above, and in Item B-4, above, pp. 61-73, 312-13 (1989).)
450. Ham, Pineapple Stuffing, Baked Beans, Cranberry Relish @ Home (Phoenixville, PA) 8:40 p.m.
Much better! Now I can see where everything is. For the moment being. Until I have to start ALL over again. I really need a better system. Sure I regroup the likes together, but I want more containers to keep everything tidy. I've just been drooling at all the pantry makeovers that are posted in link parties. Sigh, an other day...
9) Position yourself right.
The Feast of Saint Arnold will feature dishes prepared by Scott Castell of Brenner’s. Each dish incorporates a Saint Arnold beer or root beer. Dishes of beef, pork, seafood and poultry will fill each table, and diners will be invited to sample each. They can either eat with utensils or their fingers, whatever feels right. Plus, this is no black-tie affair. In fact, it’s no tie or jacket affair. Just come hungry and casual.
In November of that same year, to whites and five Blacks were killed following a dispute over voting rights. Ococee, a Black community, is destroyed, including twenty-five homes, two churches and a Masonic lodge.
Dumber You Will Be Too with Over-Treatment of BP
In his book, "No Excuses - The Power of Self-Discipline," Brian reveals exactly how you can hone your self-discipline and turn it into a tool that works for you.
I actually saw these shoes for the first time around Thanksgiving (long before seeing the uber-expensive dream shoes). The reduced price was down to about $80, but was still too rich for my blood, considering I was in Famous Footwear. Patience, my child. So I watched and I waited. The price continued to drop after Christmas, but I still kept waiting. “It will go down.”
But you are not listening any more. You are going to put those pants on, dammit, even though you are still wet from the shower and that isn't going to help tight jeans exactly glide right on. Apparently there is some itch for self-flagellation today, and you'll be damned if you don't scratch it.
For the Diamond Jubilee, the royal couple has left the world traveling to their family while they have been making their way around the U.K. We’ve seen several tours so far; tours still to come include the largest Commonwealth countries for the Prince of Wales and Duchess of Cornwall and a trip in the fall for the Duke and Duchess of Cambridge.
My third novel is set almost exclusively in a park. The park I used as a model was the one at the end of my street, Victoria Park in Glasgow, but very little of the actual park makes it into the book, for instance:
Gold 3
It might seem remarkable, then, that we should so shortly, if temporarily, redirect the notional course of this new format by passing along a young poet's efforts in saluting the male, longer half of the queer continuum, but as you shall directly see, the young poet in question made a sterling argument for her sophomore effort, which I for one could not readily rebut and, therefore, have denied to resist:
It was about the shockingly low level of knowledge that many ad people have regarding the facts of life in our business today.
As you can see, it’s this Thursday and registration is from 1:30-2pm. The cost is 500 yen. You just might be able to do this, and also attend the tournament at Amenity Dream as well! Speaking of Mishimaya, that shop is STILL the number one place to buy singles in Nagoya. I picked up a Heartless Summoning for 210 yen today! I also finally sold a good amount of cards (1000 yen worth) and took back my Weatherlight Thunderbolts I had for sale. Now I can use them again, Thanks AVR!
Love you so, Mommy
Polling institutes traditionally prepare reliable estimates for their clients, TV and radio stations, in the two hours between polling stations closing in most areas at 6pm (1600 GMT) and the late closers in the big cities, opening up a gap when information can leak.
My bathroom is small. Apartment small. But it has the important essentials so me being a gal that doesn't camp out in her bathroom it works just fine for me. Full tub-shower, sink with cabinet storage underneath, medicine cabinet above and a functioning toilet. Anymore than that is pure fluff - not that there is anything wrong with a little fluff.
The trade union Solidarity posted a video of an interview with Jimmy Manyi, former director-general of labour and present government spokesperson, where he says there is an over-supply of coloured people in the Western Cape, on YouTube today. According to Manyi, the over-supply of coloureds in the Western Cape doesn't work for them. In the video he states that coloured people should "spread in the rest of the country" and "stop this over-concentration situation" in the province. He says the rest of the country should be looked at to see where there is a demand for coloured workers.
8. Turn heat to medium and cook for 3 to 4 minutes until broth is almost absorbed. Taste for salt. Serve over rice.
Brooks’ theory – that laborers are quite literally working themselves to death – is backed up by the fact that his team has found high incidence of CKD not only among cane cutters and other agricultural workers, but also in groups of Central American miners and port workers. Unlike farm workers, miners and stevedores are not exposed to toxic farm chemicals. They do, however, routinely engage in hard labor.
Hi guys! I've been completely MIA once again. My Instagram gets updated once in awhile though. My days have been so packed. The month of April had its share of both happy & sad events, mostly positive though! Lots & lots of festivals too. You guys will see that after I find time to go through the photos. & I still need to send out the packages to my winners, don't worry I didn't forget about you guys! & Still no nails, I just haven't been in the mood to do them again. I did cherry blossom nails, but they started to chip before I could take proper photos. I've been swatching nail sticks though! I've also been itching to do some prom inspired nail art. Is prom season pretty much over already? The latest prom I know is this weekend.
Don W.
I am sick-and-tired of people who talk in whispered tones about this “Kaffir Mentality” that is wrecking our lives. And when I say “people” I’m also referring to other ethnic groups, including several blacks who don’t think twice about using the word “Kaffir”. I know it’s an ugly word, but is it not time we start calling a spade a spade? Why should we speak of a “South African Mentality” when these issues crop up. It is not a South African mentality, it is a Kaffir mentality – full stop!
Jumper - as previously discussed!
And now for Lesson #8: Form Poetry. As always, this lesson is loosely scripted. You might eliminate some things or add others as you go.
It should be obvious by now that my children are doomed.
By the way, here’s some awesome pics of Dan Girardi from SNY Rangers Blog. I’m pretty sure it was early in the first overtime when Girardi went behind the Rangers net to retrieve the puck and Lundqvist accidentally cut his face with the goalie stick. Girardi left to get stitches, but then returned to play the rest of the game. Like a boss.
Meanwhile, heat a large skillet or wok to medium high. Add coconut oil, then cook onions until soft, about 3-4 minutes. Add garlic for last minute of cooking, then add bell peppers and cook until softened, but still crisp, about 3-4 minutes. Transfer vegetables to a bowl.
Eventually Paula sold her house in Naples and moved into one a bit further north in Long Beach.
I just wanted to write ONE SHORT EMAIL I said.
It speaks volumes for why the French have such healthy eating habits. From a very early age, good quality food and carefully balanced meals are foisted on them even at school.
It was announced this morning that academy starlet Ghassimu Sow has agreed to sign a three year professional contract with the club.
But what does it mean to be a member of the congregation? This opulent structure has overseen the crowning of kings, marriage of royalty, and the burial of many. I can appreciate the irony of Elizabeth I buried with her sister, bloody Queen Mary. But what does that have to do with worshipping God?
‘The tax is also a major issue in this bill’.
There are a few interesting references to goats in the Bible.
1 refrigeration
Happy voting yiz feckers!
Paarl, South Africa
Police did not provide information about how many people were shot or their conditions, other than the toddler was a girl, between one and 2-years-old.
My ex called me this morning, to play me a song about being in the darkness and going out into the light. He knows, better than anyone, how difficult and scary this process has been for me and how much I have been paralyzed by it and hiding in my apartment. He said, "You know, if you think about it, you and I are in the Winter of our lives, but we are in the Spring of this moment." It's pretty amazing that he and I started this journey together and despite our huge differences and a very difficult breakup, he happened to be with me on the day that the journey was completed. I'm very happy that I could share it with him...and that there is plenty of good cheap wine in France.
Recognize these chocolates? This is how Celebrations used to be, before they decided to bring back Twix to replace Truffles.
St. Clair, Michigan (population 5,485): With City Superintendent Scott Adkins heading to a new job with Roseville in two weeks, the city council will have to act swiftly to replace him, according to The Times Herald. Adkins said he submitted a letter of resignation Wednesday to Mayor Bill Cedar Jr. If the council accepts his letter, Adkins’ last day will be March 1. The Roseville City Council voted unanimously Tuesday to hire Adkins as city manager with a one-year, $94,000 contract. Adkins said he’ll start March 6. Adkins said he asked for a one-year contract with Roseville so both parties could evaluate if they were a “good fit” for each other. He said he has created a list of transition items he plans to discuss with St. Clair department heads and council members. One of the things Adkins was working on was bidding out city services, per the council’s request. Adkins said he started searching for a job in another city because of the council’s openness to privatizing city services. He said he didn’t want to wait for the council to put his job out to bid as well. He’s served St. Clair since 2006 as superintendent and makes $81,177 per year. Adkins’ contract with St. Clair was to expire in mid-2013. There is a clause in the contract that allows him to submit a resignation and attempt to give 30 days notice, but it isn’t mandatory, Adkins said. If the council fires Adkins, the contract states the city must pay him a six-month severance package, he said. St. Clair City Clerk Janice Winn said the council has directed her to assume some of the superintendent’s duties for an interim period when past superintendents have left. The Michigan Municipal League has a list of qualified people who can serve as interim city managers, Adkins said. He said he notified the mayor and some members of the council more than 30 days ago he was seeking employment elsewhere. Adkins also applied for the city manager position in Algonac on Jan. 31 and was offered the job, as Algonac City Manager Karl Tomion is retiring March 11. Algonac City Council voted Feb. 7 to accept resumes for the position. According to a schedule set by the Michigan Municipal League, it will take about 10 weeks before Algonac is ready to make an offer to a new city manager. Tomion said he’s trying to expedite the process, and has already received some resumes. He makes $72,000 per year.
If you are in the area, come by and see us!!! I will be teaching two classes there on Saturday.
So, normally in the States I think you’d keep pushing and deliver your baby, but instead I had two nurses help me off the bed I was laboring on, walk across the hall and get into the stirrup seat to deliver. My doctor had showed up by this time (she’d checked in at least once before) and the deliver room was bustling! Dan was able to come in at this point, which I was SO thankful for. And Sheryl took pictures (see below). I was ready to deliver this baby but the doctor wasn’t quite ready so I had to wait and not push through a contraction that I really wanted to! (All that time that I was trying to hard to push and then I really wanted to and couldn’t!)
Now, a song that I can not help but move to..I hope it helps me feel better. If anything, it will at least remind me of when I was a cute, young, smaller, teenager and help me to get through this funk so I can be a cute, smaller, happier in my body adult.
Right now, my feelings are so mixed up that I don’t know how to feel. At least I have a therapy appointment today. I get to work with the new girl, but I don’t have to pay. So that much is good. I felt bad about that until DH explained to me that if she fresh out of school, then she has to take on a certain number of free clients as part of her professional training. That makes me feel a little better. I hope she is better than my interm therapist. I really miss my original one though. *sigh*
Very few people know about this place but I have met people from Ottawa to Argentina here; and yet I always encounter someone I know too. (I love that; it makes the world so much smaller.)
I can get so lost in your tiny, precious face. Watching you sleep is now a favorite way to spend my time. You're getting older and I'm starting to feel loved back! Your smile brightens up the room when you see me, and you are so sad when I put you down. These are all new things you're doing just this past week. You're also talking up a storm and officially sleeping through the night on a full time basis. You are the most happy, content, and dare I say lazy baby and I couldn't have asked for a more perfect fit! You still very rarely cry. You have your fussy moments but even then it's sometimes hard to tell if you're fussing or talking.
1 1/3 cups chopped red bell pepper (about 1 large)
That's me in a fucking nutshell.
That should keep me busy most of the summer, along with dishcloths for the etsy shop, toys for the children in my life and what ever else pops up in the near future
Power has almost identical effects to cocaine and too much of it can produce too much dopamine leading to more negative effects such as arrogance and impatience.
I am blessed to have four brothers and a sister. We range in age from 51 to 40. Each of us has carved our own initials on our trees of life. We have all been blessed with different gifts and talents. A couple live in apartments. One has a rather large home. Two have decently sized homes that they own. One of us lives in a church parsonage (want to venture a guess as to which one that is?). We all have different professions. One owns his own business. Another sells automobiles. One loves the music field. One hooks up cable. I am a full time wife and mother and my sister is adjusting to life after losing her spouse.
International law is neither based in national habits and conventions nor even democratic jurisdictions, but current political ideology. Many judges in the supranational courts are not even proper judges but diplomats and often former Eastern bloc Communist officials. Through the Human Rights Act they gave asylum to countless people who are a military threat to us as long as they claimed they would be in danger if returned to their destination countries.
REPORT: THE PROBLEM OF POVERTY POST-RECESSION
Rick Santorum won a decisive victory in Louisiana on Saturday besting Mitt Romney 49 to 26.7 percent, this compared to 2008, when Mike Huckabee narrowly beat John McCain 43.2 to 41.9% (NYT), gives credence to the Exit Polls from CNN that showed Santorum winning in demographics which are normally Romney territory – such as moderates and those who consider themselves “liberal”. In watching the returns, the conversations between John King and Wolf Blizter suggested that to be a “moderate” or “liberal” in Louisiana was far different than being a “moderate” in a different part of the country. However, the video posted on the CNN site, suggests a strictly Religious win with the report focusing on the Bible Belt CNN Video here. This may have been the case in the 1980’s, 1990’s, but with a fall in manufacturing in the Northeast and elsewhere, the migration has caused a shift in both political ideology and religious affiliation in that region. Both Newt Gingrich and Ron Paul made a hardly a dent in the contest. Next up in Wisconsin and tensions on the left and in the Romney campaign are running high as the April primary comes into play.
“SIR, THIS IS THE REAL RESENTMENT ON THE GROUND. As a grassroots leader and pro-govt supporter, i really do not wish to see inferior opposition party to rule singapore one day. BUT THIS IS POSSIBLE in 2016 because when Singaporeans eventually give up hope, they wont hestite to give the INFERIOR OPPOSITION PARTY a chance to rule SINGAPORE. Like a translated saying “NO fish, prawn also good”, “no PAP, any shit also good”
The process for making this really couldn't have been easier. Since my crib sits up against a wall, I took a page out of Urban Grace Interiors' book and decided against a traditional crib skirt (with a deck that sits between the mattress and springs & 4 sides). Instead, I followed her lead and decided to create 3 individual panels that I could attach to the springs with ties and adjust as necessary when it comes time to lower the mattress with a growing toddler.
Phalanx, the great star fort of the Imperial Fists, is playing host to Space Marines from half a dozen Chapters, alongside Inquisitors, Sisters of Battle and agents of the Adeptus Mechanicus. They have come together to witness the end of a Space Marine Chapter, as the once-noble Soul Drinkers, now Chaos-tainted renegades and heretics, are put on trial for their crimes against the Imperium. But dark forces are stirring and even this gathering of might may not be enough to guard against the evil that is about to be unleashed...
Laurie Barkman of The Resumator explains, “We’ve been told for a long time, ‘This is how you do recruiting, and here’s what matters,’ but organizations are now more interested in interactions that help to determine a good fit. And more nimble organizations are looking at people beyond the resume.”
I have eaten
I've read many books and blog posts worth remembering. Each with a different idea or phrase that made them memorable. So even if those writers haven't been published or been recognized for their uniqueness, they will be remembered by those who read their work and maybe their words will make a difference to their readers at the time or in the future. Their efforts will have an impact.
Grandma M.’s Fruitcake (The 151 Fruitcake)
Feminism and Female Chauvinism
Tomorrow is my last day off before Christmas. The hours are getting too long to work open to close shifts to give each other a day off. (Well, for the boss anyway. He has a child in daycare as he and his wife both work and it doesn't work out well for them.) We're open from 8:00 am to 10:00 pm the next two days, then it's going to be 7:00 am to 11:00 pm through the 23rd. The boss does his open to close shift tomorrow and I do mine on Wednesday. The 24th the hours are 7:00 am to 5:00 pm.
* Follow as many other blogs on the linky as you'd like
On the other hand, a good review is heartwarming, and may help a great deal with motivation. Sometimes, writers and other creative artists need a boost to keep them going, and a positive critical reaction can help. So, when I am writing a review, I do my best to maintain a balanced approach, and try to understand what the author was trying to achieve. Sometimes, of course, it's not entirely easy to figure out the answer!
Me: Well, I already made the cookies you like.
The North East Community Assembly has copies of the Sheffield Environment Weeks booklet with lots of events from 28 April to 10 June – use this link to see what is happening over the month – http://www.sheffieldenvironment.org/events/2012/5
Something that infuriates me is a certain attitude from the media that bipolar disorder is a over-diagnosed. Now, maybe it is or maybe it isn't, but this attitde creates a culture in which someone who is diagnosed can be treated like someone who is being faddish. You know, in the 70's we had focus groups, now we have medications.
oatmeal cookies
these lectures can become,” says Venkata. “They were just very genuinely sharing what it is about their faith that allows them to be agents of change and service in the world, and inspiring one another with that sharing.”
* I really miss doing my Monday Memory posts, but truthfully, my brains are utter mush on Mondays after a day at co-op. Last week I had to look through dozens and dozens of photos in search of the perfect 15 pictures for Jesse's senior slide show, and I had such an urge to write about so many of the photos. But there's that mush-brain problem.
*I promised Ava that I wouldn’t take videos or share pictures of her pre/post surgery. The surgeon did a great job, scarring will be minimal.
Couldn’t have said it better.
Aha – no cash. So she cycles down to the Chinese store at the bottom of the village but the cash machine is down. Returning home she informs the group that there will be no electricity till the next day. A night without power. Everyone groans and resists and protests. Until the same child of the eel and raspberry pond informs her that his snake has just eaten and he needs the heating pad on.
With this in mind, I had great hopes when I began to listen to his 8-28 Restoring Honor rally in Washington, which is still going on as I write this. However, I had to turn it off. I was beginning to get sick.
I headed back up the field so disappointed but I just couldn't leave. I couldn't. I decided that I would just give the field another search, corner to corner and see what turned up. So slowly I walked backwards and forwards over the whole of the field and after this proved unsuccessful decided I would walk the drain line again, the old clay pipes were hundreds of years old, there may be a break in a part of it - so I started walking and parting the grass in a straight line again, on my hands and knees in parts - praying to the God of Frogs not to let one be where my hands were going.
Incidentally, on the matter of barriers or gating stations – our passengers tell us in surveys they like the ungated and open nature of DLR stations. It’s also worth considering that with an already very low rate of fare evasion it does not make good business sense to go to the cost of installing barriers/gates and also employing extra staff to monitor them."
Thanks in advance for your participation in this fun Mother's Day series. Don't forget to fill out the form (click the link above) to sign up to participate.
British anthropologist Alfred Gell, citing the ethnographic baffling
The birth of these two bundles of miracles is such a blessing. I feel hope today. I find myself smiling at the mere thought of them. The pride I feel for these children of mine to give themselves over completely to these babies is immense.
the cowboy, bold as a Ford,
9) Slice thinly and substitute for lasagna noodles and other noodles. This may sound strange, but it works really well and effectively eliminates the carbs from high-carbohydrate pasta dishes
Donkey Kong Minis Get Golds on all 80 levels
Author: Marie White
I have had my trusty little Hot Head torch on bulk propane setup for just over a year now. It has done everything that I have ever asked of it (less for a bit of the Double Helix, TAG and Reichenbach Iris colours - oh and Reichenbach Magic). It has, in all honesty, taken a while to melt some of the glasses into beads and also to get enough glass onto your mandrel to make a large bead. I have access to a Bavarian Beads 3d Heart Press which makes a bead 1.4 inches across and it takes nearly 40 mins just to get enough glass on to the mandrel so that it presses a full shape! It is during moments just such as those that I wished that could upgrade to a big girl's torch, i.e a dual fuel torch run on propane and oxygen supplied either from a cylinder or, more safely and economically, from an old medical oxygen concentrator (oxycon). The basic setup of a dual fuel torch including an oxycon works out at about £500. I figured that one day I would upgrade only either if I sold enough beads or I had a windfall of some description. So I plodded on merrily with my Hot Head.
and the emotional and spiritual agony of believing that God himself had deserted him.
Anyway, if you want to leave your comment on the post, I'd love to hear what you think!
4. Work Side by Side – If the team member is unable to do 80% of the work to 80% of the required standard, then have them work side by side with you. You will get your work done and they will learn something in the process. Eventually, you can adopt Tip #3.
Hello again! I'm catching up on all y'all's blogs and stuff. I haven't disappeared again.
What do you find is the hardest part about writing?
A wind ruffled the pages of a letter a grandmother had pinned on a young woman’s framed portrait, detailing how her oh so innocent two-year old son regaled the family with stories of a visit to the zoo in last weekend’s tearful dinner. A scrap of lined paper, bold scripts now blotted, was a young boy’s inspired poem on the heroic death of those he didn’t personally know. The ‘graves’ were now a mosaic of grief; none of us who strayed into them could stay around for long.
Ron Canada ... Winchester
My first grade students gathered around me for story time. They all got comfortable on the rug as I made myself comfortable in the old, dilapidated chair which held the honor of being known as our reader's chair. I waited until everyone had settled down and then began reading. All eyes were on the pictures as I read with expression and a variety of voices. You could have heard a pin drop as all eyes and ears followed the story. And then out of nowhere a little voice spoke up and said, "Mrs. Kelley, what do you say?!"
Fast forward to today. We were eating breakfast at a restaurant (that served terrible food, I’m sad I wasted my money) and we were seated right next to the window, meaning we got to see the planes preparing for take-off. My oldest again asked about those little golf-cart looking things. “Why is that thing always hooked up to the plane when it backs up?”
The problem with some allergies and sensitivities is that they take some time to manifest. This turned out to be the case with Taylor and her neurological allergy to corn. At about 1 year of age after surviving with a cold the entire winter I had to take her to the hospital again.
Uncertain yellows skim
So....ugh....right? Now its sunday, and Andrew and I went shopping to buy me some dress clothes for my new job! (thinking optimistically). Monday comes and I was so nervous, I got to the place 15 minutes early and had to call andrew before I walked in so he could help calm me down. I walked in at 8:30 and in like 3 minutes it was 5pm and time for me to leave. The day was so great and went by so fast. I was so happy! Basically the boss told me that he thought I was a perfect fit, and that I would be signing papers on tuesday. SO.....yesterday I signed my life away, and.....Officially have a job! WOOHOO!!!....what it is will come later. :)
It is this particularist morality that enables jews to unselfconsciously assert that Israel is for the jews but White countries are for everybody. Likewise that the jews are a people, but White is just a meaningless skin color or social construct.
Of course, the very most important habit to start with, if it isn't already there, is the habit of obedience. This is most easily taught if it is started when they are a baby, big enough to get into things they oughtn't. You tell them "no," and then you must follow through in not allowing them to do whatever it is, every. single. time. When starting new habits, you must choose what you feel is the most urgent to start with, then have a little talk with them (at a non-emotional time, as in, when they are getting in trouble, you don't give them a lecture about how expectations will be different from now on). You get them when they are happy, and just let them know what it is you want to work on, what will be expected, and that you have confidence in them to do it. Then you work on it with them, only giving gentle reminders to help them stay on track. It usually takes several weeks of effort to get a new habit down, and will need occasional work thereafter to be sure it stays in place. After you feel they have the first habit established, then you can add another one of the next most importance, and so on. It does take effort on your part to make sure the new habit is followed through every time, or it won't fall into place, so you may want to give yourself a little more time on the first ones, as you make a habit of habit-training!
But was that something that was building for the kingdom of God? Hardly.
Yet, I realize people must be using it for something.
My good friend Keano tipped me off about these. There's nothing really original about them (I've been around indie-rock too long!!), but I love the mix they have here... it's a bit Suede, bit Radiohead, bit MGMT, bit Editors etc etc. It's even a bit Coldplay in places, but fortunately there's enough influence elsewhere for them to get away with that!!
Maria Eugenia Ibarrarán and Roy Boyd
The problem that ought to concern us first is the fairly recent dismantling of our old understanding and acceptance of human limits. For a long time we knew that we were not, and could never be, “as gods.” We knew, or retained the capacity to learn, that our intelligence could get us into trouble that it could not get us out of. We were intelligent enough to know that our intelligence, like our world, is limited. We seem to have known and feared the possibility of irreparable damage. But beginning in science and engineering, and continuing, by imitation, into other disciplines, we have progressed to the belief that humans are intelligent enough, or soon will be, to transcend all limits and to forestall or correct all bad results of the misuse of intelligence. Upon this belief rests the further belief that we can have “economic growth” without limit.
But in many sea floor, has found a number of large high buildings with exquisite carvings, and not from the cultural heritage of modern mankind, so surely the building that was created before he sank to the bottom of the sea. “
i worked with the ladies of 'curtain works' a couple months ago! they were so nice and have a great store with custom curtains & draperies. their not quite up and blogging but when they are i'll be sure to share the link!
The blocks will measure 5″ at this point (unfinished). Have fun turning them into a quit! I will have 120 of them to use in one quilt or more and since I am using these as my leaders and enders, it will be awhile before they are all done and I have decided on a layout for them. When I do take the time to play with these blocks and design some layout options in EQ6 I will post them here for you.
3. My youngest daughter's excitement for life.
Every ounce of inspiration from me
I know that life is not guaranteed. Any day could be the last. There is no point in worrying about things we cannot change. And judge no one. You never know what is going on in someone’s life.
So if you combine freedom of choice with our complete inability to separate our emotions from our rational side, you basically have a whole species that is making mistake after mistake every single day, and then hating themselves for doing so.
11. Prove It All Night
- Working in teams is recommended to highlight strengths of each broker;
my eyes are green and I like them just fine.
Our score is posted on the easel next to the ring. We scored a 193. A fine score.
He has somehow constructed a career "as a gate-crasher" doing whatever he wants, writing when he wishes, wandering when he doesn't, or when he gets a magazine to pay for his expenses to write. A Serbian bus driver, sex in hotels, Airfix model planes and Marvel comics, unwanted books, being an only child. What appeals here as in his fiction and travel reporting and non-fiction remains his ability to capture a restless, disheveled mood. In Algeria, he remembers his stay. "In a restaurant--womanless, smoky--I order a beer. It comes in a green bottle and that is the major pleasure it affords. The food--chicken, brochettes, couscous--comes on a plate and half of it stays there."
Other than to say that neither of you would work
Here are my tips for cancelling a wedding. They may not apply to all situations, but I think they may help:
May bring on a storm but we'll weather it.
God's love isn't manifest by erasing great expectations. God's love in manifest in hope that we will be able to accomplish great expectations.
The mock election continues! my grandkids have made a radio commercial featuring Susan Marlowe the candidate. We went to the office supply store and had copies of fliers made. You will be happy to know that my campaign colors are sherbet orange and mint green. A tasty combination. We are supposed to hand these fliers out at class in order to convince the voting bloc (aka the other students) to vote for Susan Marlowe.
- Passenger Usage Fee: Passenger Usage Fee of $16.99 per one way travel per traveling customer applies to most international reservations excluding bookings completed at Spirit Airlines’ airport locations as well as flights originating in or departing from airports in Colombia or Panama. A lower fee of $8.99 may apply to certain discount fares.
At least I don't think I'm dead. Hang on. Let me check.
But then there is The Week of Kindness, such a zany mixture that it transcends any big ticket tectonics. The tire, Romulus and Remus, the white box in the middle, the baskets on top, it is unclear how these works interrelate though their interrelations are highly suggestive and fascinating. The origin myth of the Etruscan statue, mixed with the sexual connotation of the tire, and the fact that both elements create the base or the platform from which the piece grows and sustains itself, gives the piece a sense of fertility in and of itself. The baskets are both jokey and add to the mix, a basket being a place for Easter Eggs, for Spring Picnics, for some, a metaphor for female genitalia. There are no competing ideologies here instead elements taken from multiple cultures that add up to a strangely full, frisson of oddity that is genuinely funny. All the parts retain their meaning and that retention makes The Week of Kindness an extraordinary object.
Just six months into this position, however, tragedy struck when, at the age of 31, James was diagnosed with cancer. Given ten to one odds of living out the year and knowing that his infant daughter would never remember him if he died, he began the fight of his life, enduring massive doses of chemotherapy that killed the cancer but nearly killed him as well. After years of struggle, he survived, but only after enduring systemic nerve damage from the treatments that left him permanently photophobic, phonophobic and with frequent difficulty in using his hands.
My dog, Randy, is a gentleman, a character, a rogue, a rascal, a boozer, a serial shagger and a better man than most men.
The trail eventually leads to a necromancer, Logan, who was thought to be a minor wizard. But Logan has joined forces with The Adversary to gain power. The goal is to steal a priceless and powerful artifact from the archives of the Templars. Do Cade and his loyal team stand a chance to protect the treasure of the Templars when the enemy is always one step ahead?
Choosing A Serious Designer Timepiece
Plaintiffs say they were given personal promises. Noreiga, according to the lawsuit, says Caldwell promised that she’d get a job. Griffin asked Caldwell if he had to apply for union membership, but Caldwell responded, according to the lawsuit, that “There are thirty construction books reserved for graduates of this class.”
During the week, my fifth grade students and I are envious of the preschoolers in our building. "Can we take a nap, too?" They have no idea how much I want to say "Yes!!"
Chill mixing glass thoroughly. Add all ingredients except sparkling wine and stir to mix. Pour liquid into a chilled champagne flute. Top with champagne. Garnish with and orange twist.
Sorry for taking so long to update!
Step 5: Cut out around it.
Furthermore, it has a 30-second interval timer that encourages even brushing and whitens teeth.
You receive the similar error messages or an error suggesting that an invalid page fault has occurred in MSO9.DLL file.
5) Carrots, 1 large, cut into cubes
Change is part of life.The ocean is never still. The tide is always changing. So will you. Embrace it, explore it, go with the flow.
The celebrate 4sqDayYYZ (the Toronto edition of the day) we partied hardy at The Pilot in Yorkville.
I was obsessed about twins because of Sweet Valley. I decided to write a story about two princesses who were twins. One was kind; one was mean. An evil witch attacked their castle. The royal family tried to escape. As the carriage took the royal family away, something happened and the kind twin fell off. There was fire all around. They couldn’t stop the carriage. The kind twin was trying to run to the carriage, to get to the outstretched hands of her mother or her father, so she could get back in the carriage. The witch materialized out of nowhere. The witch was slowly walking towards the frightened princess. Everything exploded and the princess and the witch were gone. The royal family escaped but they were forever scarred by that day.
Let’s move on to the next question of How many hours a day should I spend cold calling?
This one is still the big glittering prize for me, even though technically I play second fiddle to Subversive founder Norm Hill, because it was my determined efforts that helped put the otherwise reclusive Tiffany Bolling and Susan Sennett in the studio in the first place. And when you hear them talk, you feel you're sitting in on some heavy emotions and confessions that have been waiting years for revelation - relief that work is appreciated, scars from harsh shooting conditions, lives that took deep turns. It becomes less of a chat and more of an encounter group, and you almost feel guilty for eavesdropping.
Our theme for Sepia Saturday this week is flight and it coincides with the 100th anniversary of the formation of the Royal Flying Corp. Looking through the old family photograph albums I couldn't find any photographs of family members boarding ancient biplanes or even shots of Auntie Miriam in a hot air balloon. Thinking about it, I have a feeling that I might have been the first member of my family to ever set foot in an aeroplane when I flew to Paris in 1973 (although, no doubt, my brother will write in to say that he beat me to it by five years!).
Just a few weeks.....
At the same time, folks from his business entourage began talking it up that Clooney has teamed up with pal Rande Gerber, model Cindy Crawford`s restaurateur/husband, to create a new line of tequila.
Ironically, we met him at a workshop called "No, No, a Thousand Times No!" He's an editor for a publishing house named Dancing Cat Books, and the talk was about all the mistakes first time authors keep making that gets them landed in the trash bin. We took a deep breath and prepared for a verbal smackdown of epic proportions.
I’m back home for the weekend, so I was able to take some pictures for you! This is my sister’s Annie cosplay for Anime North. It is not completely done yet. Embroidery on dress, back pack, stockings, wig styling and dying, and head band are still yet to be finished.
I'll be taking a photo everyday of either myself or my surroundings and adding them to a Facebook gallery and also posting them on my blog here.
Feet raced about her head as she struggled to sit up, to wake up her mother so they could keep going. But her mother wasn’t moving at all. The last thing she remembered seeing before a foot slammed into her head was her mother’s still face, covered with blood.
+ This episode is kind of like "I Saw Her Standing There," the first song from the first Beatles album. It's hard to define the inaugural quality of "Whither Canada?", as the show most definitely picked up some serious momentum in the episodes to come, but damn if it doesn't make me happy every time I see this and know this is where it all started.
Despite the danger to himself, Kenneth took a small step forward.
Well, was i lucky, it was my day at home. The only thing i was going to do was to spend some lovely time in my craft room.
Growing up on a Maryland dairy farm, I noticed a stir in the domestic animals. While living on the edge of a wilderness, deep in the northern forests of Maine, next door to the Province of Quebec, Canada – there was a mystical stir in the icy atmosphere – something too subtle, or too delicate to notice, while indoors, sitting by those flickering flames of the hearth.
Blouse (HK) Skirt (Miss Selfridge) Shoes (Converse) Bag (HK)
Have you been good? Will the Easter Bunny be visiting you?
I’m not saying I’ll never again use the boxed stuff – or the bouillon cube. I’m sure there are things that don’t require the rich buttery freshness of homemade stock. But I plan to always remember that a good recipe can be made great with the right ingredients. Some call BS on the whole ingredient-driven trend. I get that too. But that’s not because the quality of ingredients don’t matter. It’s because quality of ingredients should ALWAYS matter so much that there shouldn’t have to be an “ingredient-driven” classification.
He gave me a gift card to Barnes and Noble, too. I love Barnes and Noble. Thanks, Joe! My favorite! He said he didn't want to choose a book for me, so he thought a gift card was prudent. I definitely appreciated the thought, even though, again, just having him be a part of my day was enough.
Well, I guess they were married too. I understand the problem, though. People fall in love with writers. They underline phrases on a page. They utter “yes” when some passage resonates. If the writer is similarly in love with themselves, it’s easy to succumb to this society of mutual admiration. Thank God I have a patient husband, and luckily I haven’t given him too many instances to be patient about. I have been told, more than once, by more than one man that I am the “manliest woman (they’ve) ever met.” It is meant as a compliment (coming from a man, after all) and I take it as such. What they are acknowledging is a temperament that is neither squeamish nor shrill, along with somewhat masculine appetites: good whiskey, raw oysters, rare meat, sporting dogs, leather, European cars, and bawdy jokes.
“It’s New Year’s, you know,” Lucy said, “We were celebrating, my friends and me.” The train screeched again and slowed, but it did not stop. The four people on the train lurched again in their seats. Lucy grabbed a metal bar to steady herself. “I don’t think I like the metro very much.”
guess what? silly me forgot to give them to my aunt.
The commander thumbed his STU and growled into it, “Sector 84 Commander here. As you know, we have a commando unit operating in your territory near the river.”
2 sipping
7) Buy some new shoes...mama really needs a new pair! This also reminds me that the kids need cleats for soccer. **Mama may not get her new shoes.
Right, now I'm off to make myself a peanut-butter sarnie... Yeah, catch me if you can oh ye ravening hordes of garden destroyers!
Yes, I love that blue on portraits – it just works so nicely. I recently did some portraits with orange, just wait until you see those.
The RLRF runs are hard. They are so taxing, that the body requires a day or two off from running between the sessions. But aerobic fitness suffers from that time off. To develop fitness, yet give the legs the rest required, RLRF recommends two cross-training sessions a week in an activity that raises the heart rate, but is not weight-bearing. The program recommends, cycling, swimming, rowing, and deep water rowing.
Wears a heavy metal
One of the things I loved about being there was not only eating the food, but the fact that Italians celebrate, and I mean genuinely celebrate, their food! While I was over there I happened upon two festivals! An oil and cheese festival in Florence and a chocolate festival in Bologna.
Apparently, what most concerns these people is that anyone would have the audacity to respect others in precisely the same manner as both letter writers demand for themselves. Though I myself follow the time-honored Jewish tradition of atheism, I never take offense to being in good faith wished a “Merry Christmas!” Would the letter writers be as gracious if sincerely wished a “Happy Kwanzaa”?
Isn't this cute little bear from Dustin Pike so adorable. To me he is day dreaming of a Dear Sweet Friend! So I had to add him to a card and share those thoughts with a friend too!
The Clockwork Beer Co on the south side has recently acquired a new brewer, Declan McCaffrey who has previously been at BrewDog and Offbeat. I have wanted to like the Clockwork, as it’s not far from my flat and has a beer garden (a rarity in Glasgow), but the beer had been less than good there for several years, not bad in itself but far too often served oxidised and in poor condition. It was a matter of some disappointment to me because I remembered how good the intensely bitter Red Alt and the sulphury Lager had been when Robin and Gay Graham were in charge back in the day.
Robin A. Jess
Upland opened in 1998 and has grown its brand across Indiana and parts of the Midwest. Head brewer Caleb Staton’s beers can be found on tap and in bottles at several locations around Indianapolis (including Lucas Oil Stadium and Victory Field) as well as at their Indianapolis tap room.
Selevan SG. Evaluation of data sources for occupational pregnancy outcome studies. Dissertation. Cincinnati: University of Cincinnati, 1980.
1299 **D-V/14/1998. “On Identity.” Lenoir-Rhyne College Hickory Humanities Forum, Wildacres Conference Center, Little Switzerland, North Carolina. (Incorporated in Item 1999(16), above, pp. 452-62.)
My jewelry consists mostly of inexpensive costume jewelry, but I do have a few "nice" pieces I've received as gifts that still are most meaningful to me because of their sentimental value. Most days, thought, I bypass everything in my jewelry box to wear this inexpensive necklace from Target. I think I turn to this necklace more and more often because I want so desperately to believe what it says. I'm trying to be brave. I know that courage doesn't mean not be scared; it means moving forward in spite of fear. I want to love life (and there are more and more days when I think that I do). And, above all, I want to hold on to the thought that Eliza is always with me. I carry her in my heart, of course, but I like to think that in my best moments, she sparkles on the outside, too.
The National Union of Metalworkers of South Africa said the DA's decision amounted to "dastardly censorship"; that the DA was "Nazi-inspired" and the decision itself was "inspired by Nazi's propagandist Joseph Goebbels (sic)".
The only place I then thought he might be was the park. It had closed about half an hour after he’d left, so he could well have taken Poppy in there and been locked in.
Stone v. Paddock Productions, Inc.
She was rather surprised when all of them responded to her email saying that they would like to take part in the first exhibition.
- Share two (2) “teaser” sentences from somewhere on that page.
4) Sieve bread flour and plain flour into mixture and mix till smooth
As you leave, watch your step! Dump runs happen daily. And all of this just from the front two rooms. Needless to say, in our downtime, we live upstairs and at the back of the house. You know… at the day spa.
There is something eerie about Tiesto.
So here we go with the beautiful banner!!
Half way through my ride, a woman gets on the bus and starts cussing at the driver for being late. As she stomps to the back of the bus, she yells, "She's lucky this isn't the southside. Her ass would be grass for this." Because you know, you can get there so much faster, if you beat the bus driver half to death. Glad I ride through the milder barrio.
But it's tasty. Truth be told, the cookie lends a nice crunchy texture but doesn't improve upon the perfect pairing of chocolate and banana. I'm such a sucker for that combo that, after a few bites, I just removed the biscuit altogether and ate the banana with the rich, frozen chocolate.
Apparently the tree had been calling to be freed from this twisted burden, so off we went with clippers and saw and chompers to take care of business. Some of these vines reach up to the top of the canopy a hundred feet in the air. At the base, the vines are as big as my wrist. We take great pleasure in the effort it takes to free the trees from the vines. It’s a team activity. Though one person could do it, it’s more fun with two. There is a lot of heaving and ho-ing and yanking and putting all your body weight into attempting to drag the vine from the tree. Usually the vine wins, but man, when that sucker starts to give, and if you can dance the vine around the tree Maypole-like to get a bit more freedom and then drag on it some more and the whole convoluted bundle comes cascading down it is a real sense of victory. A vertical tug of war with nature. Many a sweaty afternoon has been spent in this pastime and many a vine has lost to our efforts.There is virtue in separating the entanglements that constrict growth, equally useful when applied in an introspective way to my internal life.
A few years later it was reported Doc died and there was no one to care for Chuck. It was said he was put into an institution, because he couldn’t care for himself.
Zhaomeng H. The relationship between congenital malformation of newborn and hepatitis B virus in pregnant women. Chin J Epidemiol 1988; 9: 360-363.
Spirit Acquisitions doesn’t mention that the first attempt to market this product, beginning about ten years ago, blew up when the president of the predecessor company, Clyde May’s son Kenny, got caught by Alabama Alcoholic Beverage Control illegally selling whiskey from the trunk of his car.
Ah… just when I think there’s nothing in the news to skewer, the South never fails verify my abysmal opinion of it. It’s Happy Hour at the Failure, and we’ve got half-off specials on ridicule and snark.
with its mouth at the center point of the arms. Octopuses have no internal or external skeleton (although some species have a vestigial remnant of a shell inside their mantle), allowing them to squeeze through tight places. Octopuses are among the most intelligent and behaviorally flexible of all invertebrates.
I have been in many places, but I've never been in Cahoots. Apparently, you can't go alone. You have to be in Cahoots with someone.
The bad news is that you have to pay this fuel surcharge no matter which carrier you use or which booking engine you use.
I did a quick search and found stumbled upon two titles that we really enjoyed. I ended up turning this into a light unit study.
Later, as we walked home we passed the post box and noticed a hell of a lot of water round it on what was a clear night.
It’s mid-way through taper week, and I’m apparently in some kind of taper panic. Race day is Sunday, which means a lot of things, including:
For now, I live vicariously through others. And last week, a friend's husband was on Jeopardy! for two days! I've only met him once, but the way I was rooting for him, you'd think we were life long pals. When he won that first day, I was thrilled for him and came bounding down the stairs to announce the news to Gary.
Toyota’s Prius hybrid cars were the runaway best-sellers last month. They made up 57% of all hybrids and electrics sold.
Bake at 350 degrees for 30-35 minutes or until toothpick inserted in center comes out with fudgy crumbs.
Hold audience with an elephant
Anyway, I'm going to entertain myself with some tea and while I'm at it why don't you tell us what your guilty pleasure is! What do you secretly enjoy but you think you shouldn't?
